Tuesday is tell you something about myself day.
Can you tell, from the title, that I had a bit of a problem with these cards? Actually, 'bit of a problem' is a 'bit' of an understatement. BTW, they are identical; well, as identical as they can be, when they are not mass-produced.
In our review, we find that the Examiner has made extensive specific fact finding, as detailed supra, with respect to each of the argued claims. Appellants' argument, as detailed supra, repeatedly restates elements of the claim language and simply argues that the elements are missing from the reference. However, Appellants do not present any arguments to explain why the Examiner's explicit fact finding is in error. Arguments not presented in the Appeal Brief "will be refused consideration by the Board, unless good cause is shown" ' (i.e., are waived). In contrast, the Examiner findings address each claim limitation raised on appeal by Appellants and also these findings reference specific teachings in Lee as showing these claim limitations.
Things are busy here on Westbrook Farms. The Lord has blessed us in many ways but challenges always remain before us. I had the privilege of spending two days at the prison in Fort Stockton. Was asked to speak and the subject was on spiritual fellowship. The scripture suggested by the Kairos guidebook is out of Acts chapter two. In it we find a description of the early church forming immediately after Jesus’ death and resurrection. It is fascinating for me to read about how they all gathered together, ate meals at each other’s houses, and considered all their individual possessions as community property. Later we read of how many were selling their property and donating the proceeds to the church. Why did they do this? Why is this attitude so foreign to us in these days? Read what it says in Acts chapter 2, starting at verse 42
So last night we went to a Japanese-type restaurant (not one I would recommend) and we took on the suggestion of a few and challenged ourselves to sit next to each other on the same side of the table.
Until then, I thought I'd share a pic of the latest Day of the Dead Barbies we'll be selling on November 2nd.
1) Iraq - everything, EVERYTHING - 4000+ American lives, "greeting us with roses," lies, treason, "yellowcake," "Mission Accomplished," an occupation that will last us 100 years. Dear lord, I just...I just weep.
When I do vocation talks among the young, or our seminarians spend the day in various high schools around the diocese, and we present to young men the possibility of the priesthood, or young women with the possibility of religious life, the usual initial response is somewhere between
Saying good-bye is never easy, and I'm torn between hating to say good-bye to friends that I love and care about, but also knowing that we really need that break from each other too. We need time away to learn to be empathetic, kind, caring and tolerant of each other again, and just learn to be good people because if we expect it of our students, we need to expect it of ourselves.
1) Continue desensitization to touch (touch with hands, grooming tools, towels, etc, on legs, body, belly, and face)
I tend to follow my heart for most of the time, and I will, but I’ve got to give everything in this, and frankly right now I feel like a little child separated from their parent: dazed, stumbling and unbelievably scared. A “grown-up” analogy would be that my head is barely above water… And in reality I can’t swim (cue groans).
In order for market forces (remember the free hand of the market) to drive American workers' compensation down to the price point where capital can rationally invest here again, the market demands gutting of defined benefit pension plans, driving down public sector wages, cutting the social wage (government benefits), and shifting the burden of the crisis further onto the backs of the poor, workers, and the oppressed. The market requires the destruction of the unions and any organizations that organize the working class, the poor, and the oppressed. Today.s union leaderships are not prepared for this onslaught. In fact, these class collaborators act in diametric opposition to the interests of the working class; they are doing everything they can to stop us from organizing independently of the bosses. political parties, from launching solidarity actions, and from striking at all – let along building for the widespread, indefinite general strikes that will ultimately be needed to confront the bosses. attacks.
The grotesque, undernourished bodies of the underdogs tease us all our lives. They seem eternally persistent. Haunting us while we travel through the joyous paths in our lives they keep reminding us of the degree of criminality they are capable of bursting out with, if left unattended for long. The share in the intellectual property that they demand is often not given away willingly. They always fight for it.
Or perhaps the reason why the Robert Hanssen story, like the film ‘Breach’ is not mentioned that much is because of the embarrassment it caused the FBI / CIA and the wider intelligence community, as his traitorous behaviour was uncovered in 2001, months prior to the other huge security breach that occurred on September 11th - another incident that provokes debate with the talk of conspiracy, conspiracy theories, security failures and ‘grassy knolls’.
And it is unwise because such tactics are the BNP's best recruiting sergeant. I remember working in the London Borough of Tower Hamlets by-election on the Isle of Dogs in 1993. It was the second by-election in the ward in short order caused by a Labour councillor's disqualification for not attending meetings.
“And once again I will answer the question: what is it needed for?
I am not sure about you but I personally find the fact that we are constantly in need of fuel to be an inconvenience. We have come to a point as a species that if you are lucky enough to live in the Western world – that food is no longer our main challenge for survival. Even when budgeting your income the first expense that you generally consider is your rent/mortgage and bills with food slotting in after that.
In order to wrap up 2011, my first full year of blogging at Room Rx, I thought I would do like many other bloggers are doing this week and share my top 10 posts from the year. These are not the most viewed or most commented on, but my personal favorites, showcasing not only what has been meaningful and important to me but a few projects I am particularly proud of.
Today, however, I would like to focus on nature’s version of the current international (and irrational) obsession with zombies. There are myriad examples of zombies in nature!
Remove from the heat.
For example, in the middle distances Anna Pierce, Andrew Wheating, Shannon Rowbury and Jenny Barringer have what it takes to medal. And with a touch improvement "could" score in those events. So I'm going out on a limb with this foursome.
me and progress;
Nick Fury: It’s called the Avengers Initiative.
Documenting Structure—refers to a Structure for and also multimedia info for storage devices on the storage devices channel.
And I go back to work Monday.
I have used my Forever Friends Collection Cd for the topper and matted this onto an embossed nestie. I embossed some silver mirror card with a Darcy butterfly embossing folder from Crafter's Companion and matted this onto the matt magenta cardstock I have had for a while which I got from Crafter's Companion. To finish I have added gems, stickles and ribbon details. The base card is a papermania 5x7" scallopped edge card.
The oceans have absorbed much of this increased heat, with the top 700 meters (about 2,300 feet) of ocean showing warming of 0.302 degrees Fahrenheit since 1969.
It has been a while since I did any work on paper, but I needed more cards for sale in my card rack. Some time back, I had gotten a box of blank cards on really high quality paper. I snapped them up when I saw them on clearance. Too good to be true? Yep, when I opened the box, there were no envelopes--yikes!
"Does crime go up? No, not in any immediate fashion," Karmen told me in a phone interview back in July when I sought him out as a source for an article about crime reporting.
It really isn't a party without a cheese platter.
Jon Woodward, Communications manager at Noah’s Ark Zoo Farm, said: “We had a fantastic weekend at our zoo attractions. Sales of season tickets are up by 20% because there are so many things to enjoy here including being a zoo keeper for a day, educational school trips and the longest hedge maze in Europe. So if you want to spend as much time outdoors as possible, bring your family to our zoo for an unforgettable day out in Bristol.”
I woke up this morning expecting to have a relatively relaxed Friday, as the week has been pretty low-key. Most of my work is pending, and I’ve got other people essentially doing their parts on various deals/projects I’ve got going. I went to sleep pretty late last night, and woke up around 8AM (pretty late in the morning for me). I strolled into the office by 9AM, and turned on some music and started to kick back.
Just so you know? Joss would never have done this.
It’s the exact same way with God and His love for us. Sometimes we think He is so old fashioned, mean and unfair by the mandates we read in the Bible. Or we think He doesn’t have a clue when he instructs us to close a door in our lives or to end a relationship. We often think (even if we never utter the words) that we know much more than God. And that our way is clearly the better way.
“Wow, I wish I could do that,” says the little girl
Selection of the Projection Speed
blogger STILL won't let me add or subtract urls to my blogroll! anyone else having this problem? things used to be so eay on blogspot, right? what happened? have i missed some prime directive? did i miss a dues payment? am i remiss? (or maybe i need to cut back on the caffeine! OK, i think that might be part of my problem right now...)
Traci Heim who was the REASON why we had our Mulligan Stew and JACK WAS 'SITTING AT OUR FEAST' ALONGSIDE HER PRECIOUS TREASURES because I could not leave my precious Jack out! Traci - who knew that their family didn't qualify for him or they would have rowed across the ocean to get him... Traci - who broke down and cried for one lonely little boy and GOD USED THOSE TEARS to BREAK DOWN THE WALLS of resistance and fear for ONE FAMILY who is now calling Jack THEIR SON.
Would be great if at least one of us could solve that problem.
And now I know why I never really got into art journaling...it was hard for me to just let go and put stuff on the page. I spent most of the week on these three pages. I needed them to look "pretty", like the cool journals kept by Michelle Ward, Tracy and Teesha Moore, and many others. I know this is contradictory to what people say about creating art journals—how it's about the process, and not what it looks like. I just have difficulty doing it that way. I would love to throw caution to the wind and make a mess. I even tried splattered paint on my quote page, but hated that I couldn't control where they landed. ;-) But I look forward to see where the process takes me and what I achieve.
At the same time, I’ve been reading about Gideon. He was my kind of hero. He was just a puny little guy when God first shows up to talk to him. God calls him a mighty warrior who will save Israel, to which Gideon replies, “Pardon me, my Lord, but….”
Extended deadline to Friday, May 4 for
OPENING AN OYSTER
That, I’m afraid, will be the lasting legacy of Whitney Houston.
If you arrived here from my talented friend
Conspiracy Theories and Interior Design
San Miguel, Tucuman, Argentina
Here's to new beginnings.
7. I don’t really like chocolate, I’m more of a savoury snacker.
So let me start by saying I was a savvy consumer of the fresh hop beers this season and I did not make it to a fresh hop beer festival this year so I have not had a single fresh hop beer I didn't like. But even though my sample has severe selection bias issues, might I be bold enough to suggest that the NW craft beer community is really starting to get it in term of brewing with fresh hops? Perhaps.
absolute devotion and coddled idolatry to self; your glorification of sin and
Unfortunatelly for all of us freedom is weaker and weaker. Feable ad almoust impossible to perceive in all our richest societies. We are jailed… this is a fact. It is caused my the massification of thoughts, of desire, of love and of needs.
While others remain busy or smartly talking, forever teaching thrift,
Here are some pictures of flowers I've quilled.
toward the center of the galaxy and start waking up. At one-hundred-eighty degrees opposite the last shift, the next one is imminent.
Am I even allowed to say that? I'm not an arrogant person, but I'm not filled with self-loathing or insincere insecurities either. I'm not saying it is going to land me a publishing deal or anything - lets face it, few books are doing that these days - but hell it is certainly good enough to have another crack at it.
So here's the deal, folks. I'm going to be on the road for the next few weeks, and my posting during this time will be erratic at best. Which is a problem since this space often goes into mind-numbing detail on the various elections. So I'm telling you right at the outset, that you're not going to see a lot of that this time around.
Mr Rose spoke at length about how he studies the way women hold their heads, walk, talk etc, and tries to emulate them. If he really was a woman, he wouldn't have to study feminine characteristics, as he would already have them. The fact that he can identify the distinguishing traits which differentiate men from women gives proof to the innate existence of theses differences. His own studies prove that he is a man. He may be a man who likes to play at dressing up, and more than likely gets sexual pleasure from his transvestism, but he is a man nonetheless.
How do these manuscripts change what we believe the original New Testament to say? We will have to wait until they are published next year, but for now we can most likely say this: As with all the previously published New Testament papyri (127 of them, published in the last 116 years), not a single new reading has commended itself as authentic. Instead, the papyri function to confirm what New Testament scholars have already thought was the original wording or, in some cases, to confirm an alternate reading—but one that is already found in the manuscripts. As an illustration: Suppose a papyrus had the word “the Lord” in one verse while all other manuscripts had the word “Jesus.” New Testament scholars would not adopt, and have not adopted, such a reading as authentic, precisely because we have such abundant evidence for the original wording in other manuscripts. But if an early papyrus had in another place “Simon” instead of “Peter,” and “Simon” was also found in other early and reliable manuscripts, it might persuade scholars that “Simon” is the authentic reading. In other words, the papyri have confirmed various readings as authentic in the past 116 years, but have not introduced new authentic readings. The original New Testament text is found somewhere in the manuscripts that have been known for quite some time.
Following Dr. Robert Williams theory the affect of the 2009 law prohibiting Americans to cross the Canadian border without a passport has substantially limited the amount of US visitors in Canadian casinos. With some sources listing the drop up to 70%.
I have been on the spinning wheel again. I can't say I've 'got it', but at least it's taking less time to get going, and longer to mess up. I guess that's progress?
A laugh
So even classless ol’ me shouldn’t usually have to worry about walking around publicly with porn in hand that often, right?
Thus, whatever your personal view on Anna, it is not him but his cause that needs support. The government can crush a few activists. However, it cannot crush India on the streets. A peaceful, firm, decisive protest is every Indian’s birthright, and must be exercised in times of need.
1. When and how did you become a Pampered Chef Consultant? I became a Pampered Chef Consultant in December 2011. I had spent some time in prayer seeking a way to remain a stay at home Mom.
Here's to books like the Worst-Case Scenario that keep kids reading, even after the story ends.
Words of old that come a-traveling by the riches of the times,
I know the journey seems so long
2. We were so close last year, I guarantee we are better this year.
the general track of this storm will put it through central missouri.. border to the south around Little Rock Arkansas — border of the severe to the northwest will be Kansas City..
People keep alluding to the fact that it’s leap day and that one should take advantage and do extra things on this special day that comes once in 4 years.
So if you are looking for a family friendly restaurant with good food and great service you need look no further than Ciao Mediterranean Restaurant and Pizzaria in Gwynneville.
The Hovis Trader
Why does 21st Century Policing have me so uneasy?????
as a pail of water would.
The Elysian was founded in 1995 by principals Dick Cantwell (President/Head Brewer), Joe Bisacca (CFO/Head of Operations) and David Buhler (Sales & Marketing Director). Our first Seattle location, a 220-seat beer hall and our main brewery, opened in 1996 on Capitol Hill, Seattle’s most populous neighborhood. In 1997 Elysian was chosen to operate a pub and small brewery at Gameworks—a large entertainment complex owned by Universal Studios, Dreamworks & Sega. Elysian left this partnership in 2002 upon expiration of the five-year contract. A short year later Elysian opened TangleTown, an 80-seat neighborhood brewery/bistro. With a 3-bbl pilot brewery, Elysian-TangleTown acted as the brewers' test kitchen, fueling the creative fires and helping cement Elysian's reputation as Seattle’s top brewpub. The most recent addition to the Elysian empire, Elysian Fields, opened in August 2006. Perched next to Seattle’s two sports arenas, Fields seats 400 and packs the house at lunch and on gamedays. It is typical for us to offer over twenty different Elysian beers between the three locations.
-In 1954, he set career highs in several categories, batting .304, slugging .579, and belting 42 homers with 130 RBI.
You captured something inside of me
"What do you do with that, then?" they asked.
The magnificent Russian scenography has also its little spot in Lavapies neighbourhood with the tiny Chejov Chamber Theatre, where the big myths of Russian literature are played, such as Dovstoievski and his White Nights every day of the weekend at 20.30. Founded by Ängel Gutiérrez, a Spanish war kid, its future is pending now due to recent budget cuts. For the moment, however, we can still enjoy one on of the best theatres in Madrid, with unanimously favourable critics.
I would definitely save up money and get their cream foundation man! I believe it's not cheap!
Greetings, suicidal fellow! How are you?
Purina ALPO Cans $1.50/20
and old hurts fresh,
I didn't get to make "smelly" comparisons between gas grills, gas lawnmowers, lawn-beautification chemicals and 4 chickens right then because the police pulled up and told me to stop blocking traffic.
And serpentine flowing hips
Now that we're back into the swing of things after the festivities of recent weeks, I hope to be posting more regularly.
Respect the spell limits, wouldya?
Now, don't judge me, but I never make my own pie crust. I don't have the patience, don't want to spend the time, and don't believe there's a need to do so. I always buy the refrigerated (not frozen) stuff in the bread & cookie dough section of the grocery store. It tastes great and saves so much time. For these cupcakes I cut out rounds of pie dough and placed them in the bottom of the liners. I then poured the vanilla cake batter over the rounds and baked them as usual. Once cooled, I carved out the centers of each cupcake, and filled them with the cooked pie filling, heaping it over the edge of the hole. I iced each cupcake with fresh whipped cream and garnished them with a lattice pie crust and some strawberry-rhubarb glaze.
Fubbery – Deception
I travelled at night, so time to think and thank goodness it never rained that day because i didnt have an umbrella, although warnings of, could you please carry one, warm clothes, boots from mom a reminder the whole day before embarking on my journey were a million, Í love you mom’ but men those calls were so many….
Every day, Christine must begin again the reconstruction of her past. And the closer she gets to the truth, the more unbelievable it seems.
Maybe this is the first time you have ever heard those things.
The benefit of their not creating laws for three-fourths of the time, however, is that the House can do less damage. They did pass the Cyber Intelligence Sharing and Protection Act (CISPA) which would further take away privacy from people in the United States as well as a $46 billion small business tax cut bill. They also managed to pass the bill keeping federal student loans at 3.4 percent by eliminating $3.2 million for breast and cervical cancer screening for women, immunizations for children, and screening of newborns for congenital heart defects, hearing loss, etc. None of these bills has a chance of surviving a Senate vote or a presidential veto, but the representatives want to look busy.
More than any other sport, soccer encourages these sorts of displays – a childlike sense of play, the wild and ecstatic overflow of energy that culminates in such moments of wonder. American football, almost by definition, discourages such artistry. The national sport of the USA is more about strength, strategy, and control than manic displays of energy. The most brilliant stars of American football are guys like Peyton Manning, Tom Brady, and Troy Polamalu – none of whom will ever be confused with the athletic brilliance of Lionel Messi. Of the three, the only one who remotely calls forth the sort of childlike ecstasy of soccer’s finest is Polamalu, yet even in that case, the brilliance is more about carefully practiced technique than the more reflexive, instinctual running of soccer’s finest.
I saw these a while back on a Scarletta Bakes, a blog I adore because of the great recipes, the photography and the fact that she always has me laughing out loud. I bookmarked them because I fell in love with them the minute I saw them. They are as delicious and crumbly and buttery as they look. They are quick and simple (my favorite two words, I know, but so true) and you can make them in two steps if you are busy. Also, you cannot but help getting a little excited when you coat them with your finger tips in all that powdered sugar, making you feel like an authentic Andalusian or Mexican abuela.
Next blog post will be all about what to get that 60s lover for Christmas!
Suede We are the pigs UK
I loaded the DIY app on to my old iPhone 3G. I plan to let my boy use the app on this device without supervision. It’s the first app I’ve seen that passes that test for me. I’m not sure he’ll use it, but I bet he will. And I like it, because it’s an accessory to his physical world, not a replacement for it.
Well many people will disagree, and yell and gimme that “all men are NOT the same, nobody told you to try them all whore!” And then you’ll walk away all smug and then I’ll laugh at your unoriginal ass that needed a tweet from a parody account of some B list actor from that bad movie you watched to insult someone so that you can feel better about yourself, even though you cry yourself to sleep after eating a packet of soggy biscuits and flat soda for supper… But I digress. Like I said, you can.
For the flowers, I stamped a Hero Arts poppy stamp, masked it then stamped a background script stamp. Coloured with copic markers and added the title.
56,000 people in the U.S. become infected with HIV every year. We do not live in a perfect world, so it is sometimes difficult to practice what we already know to protect ourselves against HIV/AIDS. One way to decrease your risk of HIV infection is to engage in safe sex. “Safe sex” includes knowing your own and your partner’s HIV status and using condoms correctly and consistently. If you believe that you may have been exposed to HIV after unprotected sex, you can take medications to lower your risk of HIV infection (called post-exposure prophylaxis or PEP). PEP is effective if taken within 36 hours of exposure, so you should go to your local hospital’s emergency room, urgent care clinic, or HIV clinic as soon as possible to access PEP.
It is never easy to reflect upon our own lives, and our own self-development path, but I don’t think personal transformation can take place without deeply felt internal examination. To submerse into the “dark night” in Mauna (silence), a retreat, or even meditation is necessary. The mind must be quieted and to be with yourself without distractions is important. It gives you space to evaluate where you’ve been and where Spirit can help take you to the next level.
In the 1960's, the Honorable Lorna Lockwood was a candidate and was almost nominated to be the first female justice on the United States Supreme Court. However, President Johnson appointed Thurgood Marshall, the first African American U.S. Supreme Court Justice, instead.
To get more of the book's flavor, go to the Menu tab "About the Story". For my bio, click on the "Meet the Author" tab. You're also welcome to leave a comment. You can click on Chapter 1 and 2 (both posted under "New Posts" and "News & Overviews". At the bottom, you can talk about which chapter is the best to lead off the book. Thank you, bloggers.
Living with and through change is educating yourself.
“The whole situation left me kind of numb,” he said. “It’s kind of like, ‘You’re on your own, buddy.’”
Remove sweet potatoes from the oven. Add green beans to the pan and stir. Return the pan to the oven and continue to roast for an additional 10 minutes, until sweet potatoes are tender.
Remember - review your operator's manual regularly and put on your PPE before starting your chainsaw work.
I am not denying him his right to his portion of the marital property. We just have a difference of opinion about what defines “fair and equitable” distribution of said property.
Of course, we do not realize that this is post apocalyptic Earth until the very end and the iconic scene of the destroyed Statue of Liberty. It goes to prove that if you are recruited to go on a time shifting space mission, then you should stay at home.
As I said this, Dominique turned around to smile at Elijah, who was staring at the carpet in shame.
I should be honest by telling you that there is one downside to this meal, and that is removing the meat from the bones. Usually, we eat at least half the meat during dinner, and then I have to pick the rest of it off the bones. But, a few minutes of work is totally worth it, because this lovely, juicy, tasty chicken makes the best chicken salad ever. Put it on a nice fresh hoagie roll for full effect.
After having Evan, there was no question - what I wanted to do was nurture and be with this tiny little person. I was actually surprised by that! I had figured I'd take maternity leave for ten weeks, then put him in daycare and keep working... because that's what people did. After I met him? There was NO WAY that was happening. I was a single mom when I had him, and I found ways to make it work - watching kids so I could be with him, working on the weekends when his Dad had him. We lived on next to nothing so I could be with him - I found a place to rent for $200 a month that was, admittedly, falling apart. It didn't matter.
They had a few items by an artist who perfectly captured the camaraderie of the old mining communities in south west Durham - Alistair Brookes. Huge, white canvasses, with shadowy black figures of miners on their way to work: the dignity of labour acutely caught in vinyl. And not a whiff of bleach to be had anywhere.
Resort, Enemabia Warm
Overall, it was a great day! I just wish we had more pictures to remember it by! I got a lot of ideas from Seussville.com as well as two different blogs I found. There were so many fun ideas, it was hard to narrow it down!
For the next few hours I lay there, in the dark, and tried not to think.
The hockey nets that cascade around the hockey rink from arena ceilings didn't alway exist. A stray puck from ex-Columbus Blue Jacket Epsen Knutsen changed the safety guidelines in all arenas.
Feta or Goat Cheese (for garnish)
How difficult and beautiful. How beautiful because difficult; because the feeling of one's skull lifting off always includes a kind of brilliant, bracing cold; because growing is never not painful, not shivery and fearsome and sublime.
They're both pretty good beers, although I'm not sure I'd go out of my way to get either of them. But offer one to me, and I'll take it.
The Thugs said, “We box.
1. If you could pick one song that describes your life what would it be?
And so I waited, and He did.
Tickets @ www.redevillounge.com
They live closed to the border of Myanmar and Laos; Karen, Hmong, Lisu, Aka, Padaung, Lahu tribes are most well known among them.
Skip wanted to pen a book of his musings on war. But his work was left unfinished when he was felled by a sniper's bullet March 21, 2007.
For the mountains of such a fortress reach high
The original and extensive liner notes by Hermínio Bello de Carvalho are thankfully reproduced in their entirety in the booklet, and give a track by track description. Unfortunately for the non-Portuguese speaking (and even for lusophiles), the musician credits are couched within these notes rather than listed separately, making kind of hard to list everyone who played on this record. Please pardon me that I am not taking the hour or so it would probably take me to piece it together and type it out... Mastering is a bit loud or 'hot' but not overly compressed and much better than a lot of the other reissues in this series (Odeon 100 Anos).
Thus it has been with smoking. When a high proportion of the population smoked, measures aimed at tackling the carcinogenic habit were relatively benign: small health warnings on cigarette-packets, no-smoking areas on trains, a ban on prime-time adverts for cigarettes (but not, interestingly, cigars called Hamlet). Once the numbers of tabacco-addicts (for no-one could possibly want to smoke for any other reasons) had been reduced to a small but stubborn hard core - largely as a result of changing social mores and the spread through the population of awareness of the health risks - it was time to bring out the Big Bazookas: complete bans on smoking in public places, plain packaging, under-the-counter transactions, intentionally prohibitive levels of taxation.
OCEAN AND ADJACENT SEAS…EXCEPT ALASKA…BRITISH COLUMBIA…
Tomorrow I will be back with yet another page. Hope to see you then!
Coffee drinkers hid under tables during the fracas, cops said.
1957: In a short time, Johnny feels better and goes on playing.
Oh, and I have 6 days to try and even out this horrid T-Shirt tan I seem to have acquired unknowingly. So Paul and I popped into Boots to get some advise (Ok, I actually may have dragged him. Possibly kicking and screaming, but that's neither here nor there).
You're not afraid.
Sora, don’t you know when a dog starts to bark, it’s followed by a bite? (Uh!)
I've never really been one to make a lot of New Years resolutions, but this year I've been kind of inspired to make some changes in my life to be a better person. If you're the same way, then this kit is perfect for helping you document those decisions. With a beautifully soft color palette, it won't distract from any photos you choose to include, and there's also plenty of word art to keep you motivated. And speaking of word art... It's also available separately in case that's all you need to help create your "resolutionary" pages...
- Grocery 5.56 euro (baguette 0.68 euro, milk 1.25 euro, yoghurt 0.89 euro, orange juice 1.75 euro, oreo 0.99 euro)
It’s obvious that the game was always going to evolve, and you can’t deny that modern footballers still want to win as much as their 40-50 year old counterparts, they just go about it in a different way.
All clean clothes located on left shelves. Shelves on right side of room contain dirty clothes.
Thanks to everyone who was able to participate. For those of you who are heavy into A-Z, I'll do another one this summer. :)
with the tiny note holes allowing a pretty pattern of light.
Yes, her friends would go through hell, at first. Roger would be devastated that she didn’t share this with him.
On the else hand, the implement of olive oil, vinegar, mayonnaise and else natural merchandise have being proven in addition powerful for the treatment of lice.
“For the past 23 years, it has been clear that there is a danger greater than nuclear weapons concealed within nuclear power. Emissions from this one reactor exceeded a hundred-fold the radioactive contamination of the bombs dropped on Hiroshima and Nagasaki.” They wrote.
He asks her what the hell is with working so hard she can’t even find time to eat? She tells him designers are working hard to strive for the Fashion King competition so everyone’s busy and no one has time to run around freely for lunch. He watches as she turns back to her dress and pins it up. He takes a pin from her, pins it and asks if that’s the way it has to be done. She agrees so he takes the pin cushion from her and starts putting them all on himself. Hehe. Apparently Ga Young feels the same since she also bursts into a smile, watching him work. That is, until he cuts himself. He hands back her pin cushion and tells her to start eating lunch and then come to his place in the evening, dressed well and tells her to not refuse through a message again. Hehe, he’s pouting like a little school kid. She agrees and he pats her on the arm, ‘sugo’ before leaving! Aww, cute!
Clickable Index to the above:
This is a crazy week. Many deadlines, much to do. Amid my stress and madness though, this beautiful poem arrived from Knopf this morning as a part of their poem a day series for National Poetry Month. I love the work of Sharon Olds and found this poem to be just a perfect moment in my day. You can see the original post here. And if you love it, buy Wellspring by Sharon Olds here.
inlaid with gold gilded tomorrows
I used up some of the cotton yarn bought at the charity shop in Scarborough to add a few more dishcloths to my pile.
In the past, a writer was at war with indifference: the indifference of agents and of editors who were inundated with submissions and queries. Those days are gone for those who choose to indie publish. It's no longer about them. It's about getting noticed by readers. And readers, my friends, are not indifferent. On the contrary, they are excited and hopeful. 'Tell me a story,' they say. 'Tell me a good story. A story that will make me forget for a while my jerk boss or the bill for my kid's braces or the fact that I've got an exam coming up that I am woefully unprepared for.' God bless the readers; they're you and me, and they want you to be good. They are looking for you, for what you create, and if they find you and like what you have to say, they'll come back for more. You disappoint them at your own peril.
Potter J, Stott DJ, Roberts MA, Elder AG, O'Donnell B, Knight PV et al. Influenza vaccination of health care workers in long-term-care hospitals reduces the mortality of elderly patients. J Infect Dis 1997; 175: 1-6.
CHARLESTON, S.C. – Doug Wojcik (pronounced WO-jick) was introduced as the 22nd all-time head men’s basketball coach at the College of Charleston on Wednesday.
Where do you get your inspiration? I enjoy looking at other scrappers' blogs and galleries.
Sun comes sparkling through the shadows
Besides Ash, other south stars who command fat pay cheques in Kollywood and Tollywood are Ileana D’Cruz, Trisha and Kajal Aggarwal. Since the two industries share a symbiotic relationship, the heroines flit between the two states and command an equal price and popularity in both.
And thank you to everyone who gave me the link to Get a Human. For those who didn't see this in the comments, it's a link that will take you to a page of information on how to bypass those automated voice systems and get through to an actual live person.
Have you seen their wonderful collections of ribbons grouped by theme or color?
A shame, but inevitable. So there we have it, probably won’t be as good, not sure if I’ll stick around for another series but for now, DO BETTER WRITERS OF MISFITS, that and GET NATHAN BACK, OFFER HIM BITCHES AND MONEY.
When we last left Michael Weston things had gone horribly wrong. Simon, the criminal he helped escape tried to blow up a hotel (foiled by Sam and Fi), Madeline was shaken down by the Feds, and things wrapped up with Michael abducted, wearing a hood in a delightfully furnished room.
Annie’s Mac n Cheese – Parmesan Cheese Flavor. I had this on Friday with some broccoli, yummy!
Ringenberg
The Green River Formation, a largely vacant area of mostly federal land that covers the territory where Colorado, Utah and Wyoming come together, contains about as much recoverable oil as all the rest the world’s proven reserves combined, an auditor from the Government Accountability Office told Congress on Thursday.
After that I did my workout for the day which was Cardio Axe (I missed this!) and High & Tight. Had a great time getting my dance on and High & Tight burned just as much as ever. Then I had just enough time to shower, get ready for work, and eat a snack before leaving. I'm pretty much just picking and choosing from missed snacks/meals earlier in the week, so I decided on a pear with 1 oz. cheddar cheese. That held me over until my break at work at which point I had a side salad with grilled chicken. I was also smart and brought 1 oz. of dark chocolate with me because that's something I can easily grab really quick when we're slow. So I ate that a couple hours after my lunch. Then I came home and cooked a delicious steak dinner with flank steak, asparagus, half a baked potato, and onions and mushrooms on top of the steak. I broiled it and it came out perfectly medium rare and flavorful even though I forgot to marinate it. Who says you can't eat healthy and still enjoy delicious food? I think being able to have things like steak and dark chocolate make this diet so awesome. Here's a picture of most of the stuff I ate today.
Do you guys own your homes? Do you have any advice for first-time home buyers?
You’ve just taken a shot that needs to be sent out to press now to beat your competitors to the punch or you need to get artwork approved quickly and the details in the work must be seen by the Art Director. Here is a great way to solve the problem. A tool every creative should consider.
What kept her from giving fully over to her emotions before was gone. The next time he tempted her into bed, she would say yes. Only if she didn't take him there first.
That being said, please note that in a couple of weeks, we will be starting some Guided Reading. For those of you unsure what Guided Reading looks like, I have attached a clip from a classroom where guided reading is being conducted in a small group setting. This may give you some insight into how to help your child out at home when those reading packets come home. Hope you find it helpful. Happy Reading!
They do a new age take on slow, mournful Americana music. I’m not particularly drawn to the new age vibe, but I know lots of folks are.
I wait in the kitchen, she turns up the radio
Stop laughing.
the xrays came back clear.
I can’t end this recap without mentioning the lack of power play goals in this game for both teams. The Flyers were looking especially rough when they had the one man advantage and couldn’t even get a shot on their first 3 power play opportunities. The Devils would also miss out on a number of power play opportunities during this game, though they would register a lot more shots both during the power play and throughout the game. The series will move to Newark on Thursday when the Flyers and Devils play game 3.
Lots of new cameras have been, or are being announced, and most of them are mirrorless and smaller. We can look forward to the new Canon PowerShot G1 X, the Nikon J1 & V1, and the Fujifilm X10, X100, & X-Pro1, the Sony NEX-7, the Panasonic DMC-GX1, and the rumored Olympus OM-D as well as others. (You can click here to read about them as they are announced.)
If you don't already know, the Color Me Copic Club is a terrific group for folks who want to learn more about Copic Markers and build their collection of colors. Beginners and seasoned Copic users alike, benefit from the club's resources. Each month, members receive 6 markers that have been selected to round out their color charts. They also have full access to a private Facebook forum where they share their art, ideas, and Copic tips and tricks. It's a terrific community resource for all things Copic.
I was going to compare the movie (filmed a year ago) to the Emperor’s New Clothes but, really, I think I will settle on describing it as a movie which should have been released at Christmas. That is the traditional time to sell turkeys.
I don't know about you guys, i've went over my budget over the holidays, since there were alot of good sales...so being totally broke, i thought i'd do a look that is very budget friendly... Personally, i've being very into neutral looks recently. I guess with the winter season neutrals are better options than vibrant colours...They requires less products and less efforts in my opinion.
Spicy kimchi, recipe follows
I'm back with another layout!! WOOOO HOOOOOO!!!! I'm so happy to be crafting again and making layouts for my Project Life album. I'm just in love with this system. I get to add the pictures and incorporate layouts of all sizes.
I watched that wretched man,
WOW cards............ show them to me!
Assets: Covert Shipping/Cunning 3, Surveyors/Wealth 2.
Yeah, ok, the Super Bowl is over and done with. Good. As @jumblejim said afterwards, “That was fun. When does baseball start?” Couldn’t have said it better myself.
Through the magic of Facebook, and the fact that I keep in touch with several of my former Hebrew school classmates, 5 members of the Confirmation Class of 1978 were also in attendance. We sat together during services, chanting the prayers and singing the songs to the familiar tunes of our kinderhood, uniting the past and present in mutual celebration.
Preheat oven to 190c/375f/gas 4. 180c for fan ovens.
Upland Wheat at 4.5%
B.Sc. (Honours) Physics
11. To avoid clogged drains, pour 1/4 cup baking soda down weekly. Rinse through with hot water.
*ensure staff are equipped to embody, develop and deliver the
I enjoyed The White Queen to a certain extent, but anyone with an interest in this period should really be picking up The Sunne in Splendour instead. I find that this novel hasn't changed my mind about Philippa Gregory's writing - I consider it rather tired at times, and end up skimming pages. Having said all this, the cliff-hanger ending of The White Queen will make me pick up The Red Queen, and I'm interested to see whether Gregory can achieve the tough objective of writing the same period from a completely different voice.
Stained glass moon. Bosphorus.Can you see me in the dark?
Be responsible for what you chose, not choosing is a choice.
Residents have already lived with one landfill site nearby. Chatsworth Blue Haze Landfill Site, managed by Veolia is on the other side of the forest, directly opposite the proposals. Mrs Sumner said: “On the whole this site has been well managed and it is very well screened from the road. But the forest is less dense on the other side so we worry Purple Haze will be visible and it’s boundaries are significantly closer to residential properties.”
Follow your talents to where your talents lead you.
This anniversary is marked by my family because of the involvement of members on both sides of my family tree. As a child raised in a home in which a portrait of Padráig Pearse was proudly displayed in the living room, it was only as an adult that I began to fully comprehend the meaning behind that picture, and as an historian to understand the very complex nature of the fight for Irish freedom.
The 2011 has a nice soapy, herbal nose with prune and raisins. The taste starts malty up front with cocoa, spices and dark fruits hit the tongue strong. Semi-sweet cola rounds out the back end. Hints of spices & prune make for a rather dry finish.
According to Sahmoud, Mashharawi was taken to prison, where he was reportedly told to remove his shoes, belt and shirt and he was allegedly detained for an hour in a dark cell. During the journey to the detention centre, Mashharawi was allegedly punched in the face and the chest, and one official even threatened to shoot him, IPI research revealed. No formal charges were made against any of the journalists. The Government Information Bureau contacted the journalists following the case, Sahmoud revealed. The Ministry of Interior in the Gaza Strip condemned the “unacceptable” attack and said a full investigation would be launched, according to Maan News. Sky News and the BBC have been completely silent on the assault on their own reporters, as has all of the mainstream media.
Things seem to have calmed down somewhat with the passing of summer, though I'm not so optimistic to believe that sanity will gain a foothold in this world anytime soon. Case in point: this report about the police response to the use of Twitter by activists at the meeting of the G20 in Pittsburgh last month.
Think with me here:
He then goes on and on and on about how I can't dance, how portenoes will chew me up and spit me out, blah blah blah....
And when they had sung an hymn, they went out into the mount of Olives. Matthew 26:30
They're characterized by fertile well-drained soil rich in calcium and magnesium (because of underlying base-rich rock types) and usually full of a diversity of woodland wildflowers. This was certainly true of the great area that we visited yesterday in Chimney Rock State Park in NC. Check out what the soil looked like!
Where was Lopez? As any HSN fan knows, Lopez was in Florida appearing on the home shopping network to hawk her new perfume. She was there the late night of July 1 to July 2.
I've brewed four or five of these recipes and they have all turned out quite good. Are they foolproof? Well, perhaps not. I brewed Zainasheff's oatmeal stout recipe and found it not nearly as "roasty" as I would have wanted. On the podcast for that style, someone wrote in with that very same observation. So here there is either some variation in the ingredients we're using (quite likely) and/or the recipe perhaps needs a little tweaking.
Hyun Joong’s “Axers” school band performance,
Blind to the world
Anyway, the past six months has essentially looked like this:
It's fair to say that the original Singer Featherweight, in production from roughly 1933 to 1964 (you can read more about the history here), is the machine most beloved among vintage sewing machine fanatics and quilters -- not mutually exclusive groups, of course. I resisted this machine for a long time due to the high price (you're lucky to find one that's complete for less than $150) and all the hype.
Joy is always there pushing itself into the open to shine and breathe in life.
Yes, Washington is indeed Rome on the Potomac. The Department of Justice is Washington's Holy Office of the fascist Inquisition, and the FBI, the IRS, the FDA, ad infinitum, are the Holy Office's inquisitors. The courts are not article 3 courts but are article 2 courts under the Commander-in-chief. These courts are courts of war as every action against a citizen is filed in all capital letters, indicating the defendant has a nom de guerre---a name of war. Yes, we are all in the military fighting the crusades for the Pope and paying for those crusades with income taxes on wages---the Supreme Court having never defined "wages" as being "income."
May you grow up to be true
This next page is a time page, the second clock face has crystal effects on it. The numerals on the left are left over from a clock making kit. The stop watch charm at top is out of my stash. Contained in this page are two tags and one photo mat.
But mid-morning, I received a large helping of stress, with a few near-tears on the side. What could be so bad? Let me give you a numerical list in chronological order:
In any event, the most recent offering from the crew at Old World is a delightful anniversary ale called Highlander Scotch Ale. Weighing in at an inspired 8% abv, this highlander may not arrive with half its face painted blue, but after knocking back a couple, you may find yourself waking up with bruises and face paint.
In 2007, the Sunday Mail ran a full page expose of Harrington’s “dirty little secret”—the fact that his then-wife, Jacqueline Sharp, worked as a dominatrix in private sex dungeons in Edinburgh (“Bureau Worker Is Miss Whiplash”, Sunday Mail April 22, 2007).
7. I LOVE TO BLOG HOP! I am so glad that I found blogs this summer because I enjoy it so much. I have even gotten my colleagues in on it and they even get giddy when they find something new to try on a blog they have seen. I love finding new ideas or reading about what other classrooms are doing. It is is like the biggest pen pal service ever but created by teachers!
Absolute metric: The percentage change in your organisation’s emissions, compared to the average of the previous five years (or number of years available until 2014/15).
10. Watch movies, as we own some very good ones, and quite a lot of enjoyable ones. I think we have several hundred.
Now, onto the not-so-hot. There were some things I thought that Rock N Roll could have done a lot better, and worryingly, they both relate to safety.
As you can see, it was a very close call! Congratulations to all who took part. We’re already looking forward to the next competition and we’re sure all Housekeeping staff are already entering their training for the 2012 edition! We would also like to thank Alison and Sameera to making this such a success, and also the maintenance team for making the Olympic rings for us!
Using Net Promoter Score to Measure Social Media Effectiveness is the 42nd in a series of excerpts from our book, Be a Person: the Social Operating Manual for Enterprises (itself part of a series for different audiences). At this rate it’ll be a long time before we get through all 430 pages, but luckily, if you’re impatient, the book is available in paper form at http://bit.ly/OrderBeAPerson and you can save $5 using Coupon Code 62YTRFCV
people strolled by with their water bottles and maps.
The document goes on to confuse “religious liberty” with the concept of getting government money to provide certain services but expecting government not to attach strings to the money. Uh, wrong, guys.
Apparent
It appears that the new head of state will be Dioncounda Traoré, speaker of Mali’s National Assembly as well as the presidential candidate of the powerful Alliance pour la Démocratie au Mali (ADEMA) , which dominated multiparty politics here from 1992 until 2002.
Matt Serra said “there is not a more worthy cause than to support our troops. Come down and carry a brick.”
Little by little, our guests trickled out of the suites and back to their rooms to retire for the night. However, sleep was the last thing on my mind. In the week before the wedding, I had been so busy and was trying not to focus too hard on projects. But, by doing so I completely forgot to finish creating Mr. Buttons' wedding day gift! D'oh!!!! Thank goodness that BM A and L were still willing to hang out with me. After a quick change to PJ's, they helped me to cut paper and arrange the photos from my "beach boudoir" session into an album. I also wrapped up my "gag gift" portion of his present: a screen printed shirt that I had made for him. Here...I'll show you - Mr. Buttons proudly wore it the day after our wedding, and everyone was taking photos/laughing at it:
Add all other ingredients, stir well, and cook on low for several hours.
"It is as it is," said William.
American Crafts. I love, love, love their clean and bright style.
TRACKS…. : 01
spitting out pulp to build the smothering nest
2) A five sentence paragraph where the first sentence gives the background. The next three sentences give worsening conflict and the last sentence asks the story question. (Think back cover blurb.)
A mistress might be cheaper.
I hope tomorrow you'll find better things.
Today I have woken up with the same energy. I’m thinking that I’ll clean out my parent’s fridge because it’s kind of a hit-or-miss situation in there.
The lawsuit has been working its way through the courts for twelve years now, leaving a variety of unsavory details in its wake. A series of emails between senior Secret Service agents became public in 2008 — they included sexual jokes about black and American Indian people; a message titled “Harlem Spelling Bee” that listed supposed “black” definitions of words; and a video clip of an interracial couple being surrounded by Ku Klux Klan members. Desmond Hogan, a lawyer for the suit’s plaintiffs, said the emails confirmed that “there is a culture of racism at the Secret Service.”
I'll share a few sneak peeks of some new pieces.
Three-Twelve looked at Seventy-one. She had a wild stare on her face, her eyes moving around the ceiling as she took in all the new information. Her mouth vacillated between smiling and frowning as her hands clenched and flexed in rapid succession.
Enjoy with a glass of milk or hot chocolate! Mm…
Prior to this weekend, our seating situation consisted of curbside treasures and local thrift shop finds for $10 and $15 a piece. They are all ladder back chairs and are white and different shades of natural wood. I love the idea of chairs that go together, but aren't part of a set. The eclectic look adds interest, texture and variety to what can be just a "blah" table set. Never mind the fact that the chairs that go with our table are over $300 a pop! No, thank you.
I also stopped off and Primark and brought a new head band which i was planning on wearing out last night but i forgot to put it on cause we were in a rush :(, i think i am going to wear it for work monday now just so i can say i've worn it cause i love it so much lol :).
That's all for today. I'm so glad you stopped to visit. Have a wonderful Wednesday!
Paper - Coredinations and GKD Cardstock, Patterned Paper from Stash
We met him. AG has workman's hands, thickly callused and huge. He was wearing handmade clothing and had the traditional beard. I dug out the rough sketch that I'd tried to draft onto graph paper to show him what I meant. I also sheepishly showed him the pictures that I took on my iPod so he could see what I meant.
MJ: You have a fully active and popular SoundCloud profile, do you think social media is key for people like yourselves to get your name out there?
This year, Holly had an idea to wrap lights around a banister sort of fence on the other side of the room, fastened at a center point on an eye hook. Keith set that up for us.
I was recently sent a Christmas Cupcake Set by Meri Meri and some cupcake wrappers from Cake & Cupboard to review. Cake & Cupboard is a specialty cake decorating supply store. They have everything for your baking needs from mixing bowls to spatulas, to cookie cutters and cake stands and much, much more. Everything you could possibly need for whatever you are baking, they have it. I was so impressed by their store...I was actually awestruck as I looked at all their products.
The CLASS portion of ObamaCare was known to be unsustainable from the get-go, which is why the bill itself required it to be examined after passage before implementation. But, the estimated $75-billion revenues from its early years’ was key to falsely claiming that ObamaCare would not increase federal deficits, before CLASS itself went into huge deficits.
SO...the winner is Olivia Waite for her "Fifty Shades of Fame" entry. Olivia, you'll be getting an email this week with your EC gift card code.
Specializing in mainly dog collars and leads (or, leashes), Ella's Lead is owned and operated by husband-and-wife team Rebecca and Ben Smith. They also make lovely cat collars and they can (and do) make custom-make bracelets and cuffs for people. That's what I have here- a custom bracelet made in the "Skittles" pattern, black leather and a spectrum of sparkly goodness.
Norbert grabbed the sunroof opening with his hands, then stretched and climbed out of the car and slowly walked to the wood rail along the cliff. He squinted and looked out across the Simi Valley as if he were surveying his own private property.
FAVORITE QUOTE: "Ooh! I hates Christmas! And I hates mistletoe! And I hates kissing! And I say bah humbug to the whole thing!"
Five years ago his daughter, Rebecca, went missing on the eve of her thirteenth birthday. A year later the first card arrived: homemade, with a Polaroid picture stuck to the front – Rebecca, strapped to a chair, gagged and terrified. Every year another card: each one worse than the last.
6) Relaunch the Dissecting the Short Story series on my blog - Done, though I have to say that the relaunched version hasn't seemed to garner any more interactivity than the original version. I'll give it a go for another month or two, but it's possible that this feature will get retired permanently over the summer.
7. If you are the recipient of a handcrafted item and decide within 2 years its not the thing for you, offer it back to its creator before selling it or regifting it to someone else. Its insulting to ask about a piece made for you to find out you donated it to goodwill, I got $5 at my garage sale for it, or hear from you “oh, that grey sweater. I gave it to my ex-boyfriends girlfriends best friend because it just wasn’t me.”
Sensual Feast
Reluctantly becoming an adult,
the entire evening sky would be in the palm of my hand.
The Lord’s command “to guard our hearts with all diligence” begins with noticing what’s happening to them as the issues of life unfold. So begin today. Become a noticer, and follow the rules of engagement to fight the most important battle of your life. You won’t be sorry you took the risk.
In addition to going through background checks and security clearance, winners must agree to be used without compensation in future Campaign materials; OFA releases videos and other promotional materials about the lucky winners' time in the spotlight with the President.
July 15, 2010—Our first week in Darwin has been very busy. The first night that we were here, we joined Tin Soldier and Airstream for dinner at the Darwin Sailing Club. The food was excellent, and it was great to catch up with everyone since we had not seen these two boats for a year.
into the blaze of death
I was lucky to be invited to the SEEP Network’s 2011 annual conference to present in a workshop and report for the technical track on vulnerable populations.
Which still are unreproved, if undesired.
So I read a bit more of this story. I doesn't take long to see what is happening here, another couple of paragraphs.
for he has been mindful
Worshipping the God who can
hahaha, lol~!
of many lost, yet, joyful Junes...
Remember, most everyone hates hipsters.
"Please stand where you are when I call out your name, and parents,
Have you heard of a good post, song or book name lately? What are you're thoughts on naming posts?
I began my morning walk eagerly, with soft but assured steps, my hiking boots leaving a deep trail in the pliable, wet sand. I focused on a large tree trunk resting lonely on the widest part of the beach, far in the distance. That is my destination, I whispered to myself (I find that I have been talking to myself loudly quite frequently here.) I walked, looking at everything around me, beneath me and above me. Each rock had its own story, a lonely feather announced that a bird walked the same path a bit earlier. To my right, on one of the evergreens, a gorgeous, purple-black bird watched my approach silently.
I was always bullied by the popular girls. You know the ones, the ‘pretty’ ones with their pink and blue eyelids (like from the movie Mean Girls, but in middle school with weird eye shadow). I was overweight and I had glasses, I was the perfect target. But the thing is, nothing horribly bad ever happened to me. Nothing bad enough to scar me for life that is.
The Manufacturer: Different manufacturers put different prices on similar rods made from the same material. Some manufacturers include some kind of an extra charge in the dental implant’s price for their brand name. This is a lot more esoteric and therefore harder to explain. It’s like trying to explain the difference between Polo and Hanes T-shirts.
Avon Clearskin Blemish Clearing Spot Treatment
Thanks to Kacie for her enthusiasm and commitment to providing companionship and valuable activities for our community’s senior citizens. Interested in joining her? Bingo Party at J.B. Knowles occurs on the third Wednesday of every month from 6:30 to 8 p.m. Game Night occurs on the fourth Tuesday of every month from 6 to 8 p.m.
Of course the stamps are from the last PK stamp of the month
(I am pretty much obsessed with goat cheese. If you don't like the addition of lemon and/or garlic, just use plain- it will still be amazing.)
Along with my commitment to do as many of the 21 days as reasonable, I also committed to meditating more. Right now, it’s holding steady at 2-3 10 minute intervals per week, and I’m sticking with the bell sound meditation. It’s very simple and focuses on…c’mon, guess…a bell sound. It’s a very nice bell sound. This is kind of big for me. During my teacher training we sat through an hour long meditation. Throughout that experience, the guide reminded the class (me) to sit up straight if the class (me) found ourselves (myself) leaning over. I was uncomfortable, tired, and bored. To prepare for this experience, I meditated while refreshed and sat on the floor with my back supported. I could focused on the process, so it was easier to work with my mind’s activity. It feels good to have a way to be successful.
If they are genuine Nazis, they shouldn’t be on the EDL demo in the first place. Deal with them likewise. The Nazis and racists are coming along to EDL demos because the media says that we are Nazis or racists, not because the EDL says it is Nazi or racist. The Nazis have swallowed the media anti-EDL propaganda in full. Thus they are making fools of themselves!
When opening the card, it revealed the treasure of two teabags: Vanilla Nut Creme Decaf Tea and Pomegranate Raspberry Green Tea - both from STASH. Can you hear a cup of tea bewing right now?
Sweet.
The other night, I opened the window behind the sofa. I supposed I opened it with a flourish, an UMPH, i.e., with a bit of force and energy.
in a car accident with you than be kidnapped. You can leave them alone, all day long if you like (provided that they are of an age where they are no longer running into traffic and such), and nothing will happen that can’t be fixed with some Bactine and a Band-Aid.
And then there's James' own proposal to mash-up some of the Hommlet premises / adventure seeds with fungi-based zombies for what he's calling Death Fungi Doom:
For this refusal, “It would be necessary to reassemble philosophy and religion, theoreticism and terrorism, under a Principle of Arrogance and oppose it to a justified humility. In order to make out the face of the Adversary, it is necessary to mix with him and to suffer the extent of his gaze to the point that he believes to have grabbed hold of you. Of the two of you, however, only you
Tell him you feel really bad about the plight of all the brown, illegal immigrants that are here in America.
This piece is most certainly on my to-do list. That is, if I can get past those huge jumps in the bass. A small, but slender hand is one of my big issues. ;)
Bless My Soul was another track which showed the crowd how much this meant to Smiler, admitting after that he got “kind of lost during that one.” I think the crowd got kind of lost too as the energy levels were high, again, my head and my foot were in a world of their own.
Leap, then, 500 years to today’s evangelical approach, which is essentially existentialist, and you’ve got a culture that values the individual experience of salvation above all else. The quintessential characterization of this culture comes from none other than John Wesley, whose strangely warmed heart is the measuring stick. The result, according to McKnight, is that “for this culture, it is the ability to witness personally to the experience of conversion that matters most. Once one has had this experience, it’s all over … until the final party arrives” (74).
07/14 - Pittsburgh, PA First Niagara Pavilion
I mean really- What's not to like about the guy?
Source: TV 9.
I'll be making more from this book for sure. I think next I'll explore the Chilies and BBQ-Inspired Dishes chapter. There's a Maple-Infused Sausage Chili that sounds delightful, and a Coffee'd Tempeh Chili (made with espresso!) that I cannot wait to put in my mouth.
Do you feel you know yourself?
Meet me at the free show at Auditorium Shores at 7ish on right side of the stage just past the last rock wall. I'll be holding hands with Ms. Knoxious, as she sings to all of the Echo and the Bunnymen songs.
"Is he allowed to call me stupid and then tell me to shut up whenever he wants to?"
Her version of Valerie was played at my wedding, as part of the list of songs we specially requested. I was never a great fan of everything she did, but she was an extremely talented and unique singer. So I hope her family and friends are given the peace they deserve.
She was ruthless, competitive, ambitious and a ferociously hard worker. 6,000 words a day hunted and pecked on the typewriter first husband Hugh gave her as a wedding present, 750 books published, millions made in her lifetime and eight million a year now, over forty years after her death. I hope if Gillian and Imogen were even a hundredth as neglected and coldly treated as the play showed, that they got some joy out of their inheritance.
Still, that is no excuse for the low-rent Christmas candle for your baby's first birthday.
He is before all things, and in him all things hold together.
Bennett’s attorney, Joe O’Sullivan, said Bennett is a “delightful young man.”
The right-wingnuts said Roosevelt wanted an excuse to enter World War II on the side of the Communists in the USSR against that anti-Communist, Adolph Hitler, so he withheld the plans and let the Japanese kill more than 2,000 Americans.
Reese Havens NYM A 20
Throw ‘n’ Crush Claiming agenda bold Complete 2-3 Road to Ruins
Finally, finally, the birds have found the window feeder! Well, one of them, a female sparrow. She has been coming for the past couple of days. I thought she was so pleased with her conviently located (around the corner from the eaves of the house/my other bedroom window where a host of sparrows live) food jackpot that she was keeping it to herself. But then this morning there was another sparrow, too! I am so happy! I also have the feeling that with all the sparrows around, I may be soon feeding my own army of winged minions.
Spiritually?
Nestie "Labels Two" & Circle
The Junior high students each had two rounds of practicing their speeches. The first round, the ALT’s would listen to all of their students, and give tips on how to make it better. Most of my students were pretty good, but they were nervous. What I noticed with most of my students (well, most Japanese students in general) is that they have a hard time pronouncing the difference between S and TH.
How Much I Feel is a song I love from years ago and today this is just how much I feel. Not in song or poetry. Just in words and lyrics of another. While it is more of a romantic song, I like the emotion of the lines/music combined…
The North Atlantic Alliance in fact has a Pacific strategy. Most of the most recent additions to NATO’s Troop Contributing Countries in Afghanistan have come from Asia-Pacific nations: Malaysia, Mongolia, Singapore, South Korea and Tonga. Japan has dispatched military personnel, medics, as well. Australia and New Zealand have had troops, including special forces, engaged in combat operations in Afghanistan for years. With 1,550 soldiers assigned to the International Security Assistance Force, Australia is the largest troop provider to that NATO operation of any non-NATO country.
remark?'
IKAW & AKO is an online store that aims to cater to your individuality. Branded pieces that cannot be found in the local market for a lesser price. Who wouldn’t want that right? Samples of what IKAW&AKO have to offer; modeled by the lovely owner Ms. Monica Dazo
I will be back with some layouts I made.... need to edit them and get those posted.. see you soon..
and Converse high tops.
Colin did see someone who he just HAD to meet:
That headache was nothing compared to what was to come. They put several drops into my eye, including two jelly ones which made my whole vision rather opaque, and which residue still clings to my lashes 24 hours later despite many attempts at removal. They propped my eye open with something thankfully much less medieval than I was imagining.** During most of the procedure itself I was squeezing very, very tightly on a hand and the backless stool on which I sat (apparently, the less comfortable you are, the less likely to squirm). Though I felt like I was blinking, and lots of jelly was rolling down my cheek, I knew I wasn’t blinking, and that disconnect between what I felt and what I knew was one of the most disturbing things about the whole process. The machine whirred and clicked like an electric stapler. I saw intense flashes and felt quick snaps that weren’t painful at first, but grew a little more so near the end. They left behind a dull ache and a violet color in just that eye. With an eye rinse and some instructions about pain management, we were done. We left and I immediately popped several OTC pills. They helped keep the headache to ice-cream-headache levels, though my eye smarted and felt dry despite the drops I was given. I went home and slept most of the rest of the day away.
If you have dreamed of having boxes and boxes brimming with fashion inspiration in the form of sewing patterns, but cant seem to source them any longer (mid century patterns are getting rarer and more expensive), then never fear Vintage Pattern Wiki is here. All you will need is an abundance of time to while away the hours scrolling through this incredible online collection of practically every pattern produced.... looking forward to seeing all the wonderful fashion creations that emerge because of this amazing site.
Meet VH, who recently turned six.
iNav HD – Puts the focus on navigation.
The place is full of a few new faces who've made this watering hole their new home.
Not until it happens to you do you realise how easily you can end up in prison, and once you do, no-one will ever listen to you again. Declaring your innocence becomes denial, evidence supporting you is circumstantial and dismissed, witnesses for you are intimidated and ignored, witnesses against you are primed by police and told what to say, how to ensure the maximal sentence – and don’t forget, the worse the conviction the greater the compensation cheque.
This is how naive I am--was. Up until around five years ago. I believed the older you got the easier life got. I'm not talking health wise, at least I know better than that, I mean in general. Things would become easier, I'd mellow out and let things be, well, easy. I used to believe nothing would change in the world and it would skip along like always. I never expected to have to face things like, unemployment, the stock market crippling along so I may not be able to completely retire(Thank you Mr. Obama). Grocery prices and gas prices skyrocketing (ditto above) and strange and unusual things, like the occupy everything gang that won't go away, keep happening. Yep, thought it would all be roses and cream.
And when we get home, I want to let you peel off every layer of my clothing, admire and enjoy every inch of me. I want your skin to dance on my taste buds. I want our bodies to glisten together in perfect contrast and synergy. I want to feel you from every angle. Moving slowly and graciously – then fast and unyieldingly. I want your mouth on my neck, your intense whisper in my ear, while you seize my waist from behind and pull me into your own undeniable rhythm.
The statutes also tackle labor trafficking, and lawmakers — led by then Gov. Eliot Spitzer — applauded the advent of the tough-on-crime measures.
“The people have spoken”, “It’s for the greater good” ,
Be realistic about what you can earn as a writer – for the majority of us, it’s not enough to live on. You do it for the love of it.
1. With motor running, drop garlic into a food processor and finely chop. Add ginger and finely chop.
I am currently on what I expect to be a final edit, fixing only minor details, after which it will go through one more read-through each from my editor and myself.
Erin Gates, founder of Elements of Style (http://www.elementsofstyleblog.com/) will speak candidly about her style blog, fashion, culture and the scene inside and outside of Boston. Her career as a blogger is skyrocketing right now, and Erin will tell us how and why.
To know, when summer is arriving,
He admitted in text messages that he had sex with women that were outside of his marriage, including young women that were between eighteen and twenty. The wife turned off of the internet because of his addiction to pornography.
½ teaspoonful each of cloves and allspice (ground)
He has now been charged with attempted theft, theft, and the delightful crime of 'abuse of a corpse'.
1/3 c. cocoa powder
I was even more depressed. because this was the day of my sons memorial service.. and then my husband leaves me.
It half broke my heart to see them go, I can tell you. But I suppose it didn’t kill me, and it’s better than losing your rider like poor Psylla did. When it was all over, Perdiccas came to feed me an apple and patted my sweaty neck. “Don’t worry, boy,” he whispered. “It’ll grow again. You’re such a handsome horse, you don’t need a long mane to make you beautiful.”
No, I will not wait for you to bring it over
Yeah. For those of you who have told me I’m so sweet and you can’t imagine me ever saying anything nasty, ha. The real Ellie comes out. I’m working on that though. Anyway, I’m about to tell you something truly amazing. Even when the nasty Ellie comes out and I’m practically clawing and screaming at God in my head, He actually listens to me, and He even answers me! Every time I sit down and think about that it just blows me away. Here I am, being an ungrateful brat with God and He’s actually listening, comforting, and SOMETIMES He even gives me what I’m demanding of Him!
As a health conscious eater I avoid all corn syrup products. I don’t care what the latest pro-corn industry commercials say, High Fructose Corn Syrup is a contributor to this country’s obesity problem. My question is why do so many weight loss products contain HFCS?
Here is a fact: yesterday at 5pm CST, TELEtoon Retro began a 24-hour ThunderCats marathon.
I have to keep this relatively short (too late!) because I’m supposed to be studying for a calculus test. I doom myself every semester, to be completely honest, I’ve taken calculus like 3 times and just ended up dropping or failing but I REALLY have to pass it this year. This is the only thing that’s holding me back from transferring, it’s really pathetic that I’m so irresponsible about this. Well, at least I can admit it for now, if I don’t pass, it’ll be my own damn fault no matter how much I blame my super asian teacher who is horrible at teaching. Wish me luck on my test. Bye for now!!!
release into the body, (individuallly and as noetic polity) and
No befuddlement.
Final point: A much higher percent of new high school grads attend college now than they did in 1985. The enrollment rate of new high school grads into college was 51% in 1975, and it rose to 70% in 2009.
The flower is a 'sparkly' white Prima flower. I inked the edges with a bit of ink to give it character and to match the dark pink in the sentiment and twine. The photo just doesn't do all that glitter and sparkle justice!!
These are from a book called Disorder in the American courts, and are things people actually said in court, word for word, taken down and now published by court reporters who had the torment of staying calm while these exchanges were actually taking place.
Then I remembered, no matter what time I finish the entire run, the fact that I completed it is good enough for me. I just ran 26K without stopping, how could I be upset about that? And it was then that I got my second (or maybe my third, or fourth) wind. I was able to run, slowly, but I was running.
5. Marketing
Toledano has managed to capture a range of emotions his father is going through, some happy moments where a father and son are sharing a laugh and others where his father is truly in despair at his condition. These last years with his father and their relationship during this time have been captured perfectly.
02. Soulslicers Anthem (Feat. Afu-Ra)
The legal ruling issued Thursday came in a patent dispute with South Korean memory-chip manufacturer Hynix Semiconductor, the second-largest maker of dynamic random access memory chips, or DRAMs. The chips are used in everything from video-game machines to computers.
Well, I have a little update...
Ahmed Aktar, Lord of the Manningham Manor,
I gave up trying to photograph the butterflies, and I only caught glimpses of the manatee and the caiman that live there. The sanctuary also houses various other animals, including a jaguar, an ocelot and a sloth in a box (imagine the complete opposite of a jack-in-the-box). Here’s a few remaining pics…
My good friend Mr. Internet just told me that it had been a while since I last made a post in my blog. And he is right! But I have been producing instead of making publications :-) My goal was to be done with the Mafia Quilt on
1 x 1014WEPK Sexy Bra Set = RM22.50
Sylvia is a Button Floozie for sure, and her book celebrates buttons of all kinds! I was so impressed with the book and how, in a palm-sized package, she has given the best of the history, wonder, and delight of buttons!
About 11 weeks out from the race, I started hitting the gym with a vengeance, once again. This is in addition to my normal running schedule. All of my leg presses and such on “leg day,” which always fell on Wednesdays, were of the one-leg variety, to strengthen knees and stabilizer muscles. High-reps and low weight ruled my leg workouts. I wanted to feel the burn on those last five reps. My upper body workouts were geared toward good core strength, and regaining some strength in my upper body that I had lost over the past year, due to lack of consistency in my gym training.
And I'm all yours in buttons and bows.
of reading on people’s lives, especially given the shocking statistics in the UK that outlines that one person in six struggles to read and write. Poor skills compromise health and well-being, confidence and employability. World Book Night’s charitable mission is to advance the education of the public by assisting in the promotion of literacy and the celebration of books and reading by creating unique moments which focus attention on adult literacy. By focusing on the enjoyment and engagement of reading we aim to reach and inspire those who have never discovered the value or pleasure of reading.
8. Lou Ann Barton - Please Come Home for Christmas
Right, I better get a shuffle on!
There are other pressures on affordable housing finance. The Real Deal reported that there’s a lowered market for Low Income Housing Tax Credits (LIHTC), a fallout from the mortgage crisis. The New York Observer reported that HPD has been lowering its estimates of new affordable housing construction, from 11,587 to 8,568 in the current fiscal year from 11,587 to 8,568, with 7,947 for the next fiscal year, beginning in July.
At Christmas time, we went to a home game at BYU and made all the kids (and my niece) "Jimmer" t-shirts (and even got autographs on them after the game!):
ya gotta find whatever works for you
The couple from All About Afternoon Tea are lovely Brits who have lived here for almost a year and they are extreme foodies. They take their white chocolate mousse cake very seriously. Becca also takes very seriously the fact that her mother in law was visiting, and the shoot was on the last day of the visit. It is rather a wonder that they were able to work with her perched five feet away in a lawn chair, fussing. I'm pretty sure all the table planning that Becca and I did in advance was directly related to the amount of time she had to escape the house for the previous two weeks. Of course, I thought it was so wonderful that she was so keen :)
From The Best Authors Lounge's opening page:
Anyway, you may recall that The Devil Wears Prada co-stars a lot of fairly impressive footwear. We mention this detail because today the Moms and the Older Sister of the Moosians went downtown to catch the lovely Degas show at the Phillips Collection (which we highly recommend for DC-area readers and visitors). Afterward, at Moose's behest, they popped over to Dupont Circle to do a little -- you guessed it! -- shoe shopping. Oh, dear. We think it may not have been fiscally prudent to turn Moose loose in a shoe store with visions of Miranda Priestly's contemptuous stare still dancing in her impressionable head. She came out with a pair of little black boots that are, by a long, long shot, the most expensive shoes she has ever owned. And yet, she tells herself, they are expensive, pretty, sensible shoes that I will wear for decades with pleasure and in comfort.
Klaus! Evil vampire antagonist who has killed everyone the main characters of the show have ever cared about!
“Wait for it …. “ (??)
D - Spaghetti, bread and salad - dessert for study group - Apple cobbler in crock pot
Check out these other writers who defend the lowly adverb. (ha!)
… initial statements about the new command’s intended mission and scope of its activities met with concerns from U.S. government, nongovernmental, and African partner stakeholders. Concerns are particularly keen in areas like humanitarian assistance and other non-combat activities that involve non-DOD agencies and organizations. Their concerns center on the view that AFRICOM could blur traditional boundaries between diplomacy, development, and defense.
This does not mean I am “running” away from people. It just means that I have a different view to a ‘fun’ night out.
The effect was similar to Kruggerands keeping their weight, but greenbacks dropping in value relative to gold. Not what I suspect Paul thinks he means by the gold standard.
I'm taking these two days off to do exactly what I want. Oh, and a few things I don't want to do like clean the house. Denny's wonderful about cooking and laundry but as for cleaning? That's mine.
and there's such a great art to it, isn't there?
1And I saw when the Lamb opened one of the seals, and I heard, as it were the noise of thunder, one of the four beasts saying, Come and see.
2) Another theft by NNPC of N285b above PPPRA recommendation.
Behold...
Linda King
I know it’s late, because I can hear the school bus on the corner, the morning weekday alarm that let’s me know I have 30 more minutes to spend in my office until I pack lunches, jump in the shower and head off to work. Where is my meditative, reflective self this morning? Did I leave her in the supermarket aisle yesterday? Where are the inspirational thoughts born of morning quietude? It was that darn button on the pants. It threw off my day and I have nothing but blame and disgust for that innocent button.
That thought alone makes me happy and shines out within the darkest of days...
It is always a treat to meet the author. David happily answered our questions and even drew a few pictures before we bade him farewell. Of course I had to get autographed copies of both books and ask him to pose for a picture with me.
Be Proud Of Your Work
Journal publishers seem like the proprietary software companies to me. Like software developers, they manage the peer review process and quality assurance although there is no guarantee that peer reviewed articles will be error free. If you can not replicate a study, should you ask your money back or ask for an updated version from the journal publisher?
Granted. It is hard to tell those two types of opportunities apart. But, so often is the case that the person making the decision doesn’t consider that they might be wrong, or see if it has already been tried and, if so, consider why it didn’t work the other times it was tried.
8. We Used to Know
I got to move
First off - an earring display! I think a lot of commercially available earring displays are pretty ugly, so I decided I'd make my own. Since my earrings are all stud-backed rather than hooks, a lot of available tutorials weren't compatible - one can't hang a stud earring, they need a sturdy backing so they don't fall out or droop.
A Bubble Tea pack to include everything you need to make and enjoy your own bubble tea. (tea mix, colored tapioca pearls, fat straws and a drinking cup)
Did yesterday's 60-degree, sunny weather put you in mind of something other than a Jubelale? ('Twas actually a bit nippy in the wind, but still.) Right on cue, a number of the spring seasonals are starting to hit the shelves--Deschutes Buzzsaw and BridgePort Beer Town browns and Full Sail's LTD 02. And of course, Widmer's newest "W" series.
Weekend is here, if you don’t have any plan to go out the best thing to do is to clean your house. It’s sounds not interesting, but cleaning and housekeeping can actually affect how many calories we burn while doing it. In cleaning periods, often reaps some excellent therapeutic health benefits. Even if one has a regular day-to-day job and can only clean really effectively on weekends, the cleaning routine can be the best possible exercise for health, physical stamina and rejuvenation.
The rest of the day was general cleaning and mopping out the remaining bilge goo. I can see the bottom! And there is some stuff down there!!! Like a battery cell cap, loose wires etc. I’ll probably suck ‘em out will the shop vac after I dump some more detergent in there… it’s still goo-wy.
He also claimed to have enlisted the participation of astronomers from the Vatican to be interviewed for the film. (The Vatican has not made any official comment on extra-terrestrial life, but in 2008 the director of the Vatican Observatory wrote that aliens could exist without contradicting the Catholic faith.)
of time off in the summer,
In preparation for the 100th anniversary of the Calgary Stampede taking place in July, I plan on making a few western wear purchases. I’ve decided to feature these items on my blog in a new series called Cowgirl Chic.
Around 90 restaurants are expected to continue to operate, with the roll out of the "drive through" concept continuing.
But don’t get me wrong, I also love it. I love helping wherever I can in the church, I love the people I get to work with, and I love focusing on the future. It was just a lot of other things on the week leading up to camp.
Green: Very funny. Say 30 billion dollars.
I thought it was about what it looked like it was about.
And you're here for just one reason, aren't you?
Dan's visit carried the overall message of deconstructing the journey of going from a child who enjoys drawing to an adult with a plethora of published books. Dan instilled in the children the notion that they can do anything they want to do in life, the choices are endless but underneath it all is the passion for doing what you love. This is a message that connects with the theme of this blog and Joseph Campbell's offering - Follow Your Bliss.
10 Width of a Circle
Yes, I had a day.
I know that loving you
After relaxing for a while, after eating, we decided to keep things intimate and share a candlelit bath – something we hadn’t done together for quite some time. We both felt very connected to each other again (we had to, it’s a small bath), and grateful for how the day had turned out in the end.
Death comes to all men or, as John Donne, put it, “Death comes equally to us all, and makes us all equal when it comes.” “Death is the great equaliser,” – Hamlet. You would think we would have more empathy when someone dies but Joseph Stalin hit the nail on the head when he said, “The death of one man is a tragedy. The death of millions is a statistic.” The reason that Shadow Child would never be a blockbuster is because it deals with the death, not simply of an individual, but of a child, an infant. What is more the girl is not a work of fiction; she was a real, living, breathing baby – at least for forty-seven days.
Have you found another great eye primer that works for you? Please share.
Content yourself with small, simple things
Here are the recipes.
As many had already speculated, former Porsche and Corvette factory driver Emmanuel Collard returns to the squad. Having experienced his last prototype outing at the reigns of the class-winning Team Essex RS Spyder during the 2009 edition of the Le Mans 24 Hour, the announcement marks a return to the LMP ranks for the Frenchman after a season of part-time driving with the US-based Pratt & Miller outfit.
As I write the three batches have passed through the freshwater stage and are skulking in the darkness of their first salt water immersion. Of course salt makes them float at the surface, where evil, oxidising air lurks. If you use a round vessel for your curing you can trap the fruit underwater with a plate. If you use recycling bins, which inconveniently are largely rectangular, you have to improvise with cling film. Noting the hint about alkalising green olives, I liberated a rather manky old box of sodium bicarbonate from the kitchen and emptied it into the green fruit's initial brine.
What do you think of yourself?
A wonderful night of scientific truth, the stars are hiding epilogues of many galaxies
Nike Shox
1 leisurely
I love this old postcard but I wish the back had given a bit more information than the obvious. Wouldn't it be fascinating to know in what hallway lined with coats hung on hooks the lads sat on a bench for this shot? I looked through a listing of videos on youtube to see if I could identify their attire. It doesn't appear that they wore those particular suits on the Ed Sullivan Show (I hope Ed Sullivan provided them with a bit cushier waiting area!) -- but it is a given that the image is well before 1968, when they recorded Revolution.
What I do want is balance between my work life and my home life. I genuinely enjoy taking care of my home and family. Musicman likes the fact that I enjoy pampering him, cleaning and cooking and baking for him. It means alot to me to be able to do that for him, and he deserves every second of it.
Well, I failed my goal for May already. It's the last day of May and I haven't written anything since my last post. Sorry about that, guys! I'm going to try to work on it, I promise! To make it up to you, I'm going to have a real feature/review today :) Back when I was pregnant with my daughter, I received a few comic books to entertain me and as a product review for my blog. My daughter is now almost 18 months old. Goes to show how far behind I am!!! Either way, I haven't forgotten and I'm posting my review now. I'm so sorry, Jim!
Surprisingly, the stats keep increasing (I'm always surprised by this, I must admit!), and so, encouraged by the interest – and the wonderful comments (always so very touched by these) – I'll try to keep posting. The only thing is, it may not be every day, so I do hope you can forgive me if it's a little sporadic some weeks. Then again, you probably don't want to be overloaded anyway!
And in the end we all fade away
But when an advertising agency is offering anything other than advertising, you have to fight your instinct to get free shit and resist. Because what they offer is largely as useful as bacon at a bar mitzvah.
I am on vacation in France and Italy...in case anyone was wondering what happened to my blog. Not that I am the most prolific of writers anyway.
In the 15th century, the retinue of the Duke of York wore the white rose as a badge on going into battle against the forces of the house of Lancaster, led by Henry the VI.
There are loads of dreams I have for our house and they feel more achievable now we have the new kitchen. It might take another 10 years (or more) before they're all realised, but if we can just achieve one a year that's good.
When words fade into whispers
I think my project in the garden Friday may be partly to blame. I decided to edge our front gardens with stones. We live in Western Maryland and we have an abundance of stones-LOL. Stone fences around the property and a big pile in the back. I just thought it needed something to “finish” it and will look gorgeous later this summer with purple and pink alyssum spilling over it.
37g crocus x 3
6. Bake in hot oven (220°C) 10 to 15 minutes
It is the same in the case of these prophets. Saying what the people wanted to hear, rather than the truth, they actually prevented their hearers from becoming aware of their own sin and repenting and taking action to avoid the oncoming wrath. Far from “being nice” to their audience, the negligence of these prophets in fact put their hearers in risk. Like those “saying, ‘Peace, peace,’ when there is no peace,” (Jeremiah 6:14) these prophets’ dishonesty, though intended to bring comfort to the people, actually exposed them to God’s wrath.
And this shall be their song.
than grains of sand on every
Here is the 4 page layout that I had been working on. I just finished it on Sunday, but had not had a chance to take pictures of it. This layout has been the layout from heck. It has 13 elves but not all 13 fit on the 4 pages.
The Kansas City ordinance is a model of how legislation should be crafted. The original plan was to simply increase enforcement. Some members of the City Council objected on behalf of home school parents who feared their children would be unfairly targeted by police. A compromise was reached by which the Kansas City School District and the Kansas City Police Department would use attendance records to
Moans enrage to groans
Jeb Bush and Marco Rubio have endorsed Romney
for home.
"No problem," chimed the Rabbi. "My people wandered in the desert for forty years. I am humble enough to sleep in the barn for one evening." With that he departed to the barn, and the others bedded down for the night.
And that was the end of the crib.
We couldn't leave without a spoonful of sugar, could we? Our sweet tooths all emerge for dessert, starting with a vivid mango pudding in sunshine yellow. The mango is a little tart - even with a thimble of evaporated milk on the side.
Combat Rock is a good listen, and if you’ve never heard it, you should take the time and check it out. Look for Rat Patrol as well, you can find it at any of your better download sites. Even when not in a pure rock n’ roll mode, The Clash were still better than most bands.
With the advent of a wider availability of education for women, a new realization of and outcry against oppression and misogyny arose. Are women really as bad as “they” say, these men who are educated by men and surrounded by educated men and uneducated women, these men who capitalize on each other’s propositions about the female sex and project their own sexual appetites onto them, these men who happening upon a woman of equal or superior learning/courage/virtue, etc. can only scratch their heads and pronounce her to have risen above her sex—are women as bad as “they” say?
Three years ago, I sat in my first Chicago apartment's kitchen, listened to some Fiona Apple, and braved my first blog post, "Small Town and Scared Shitless in the Big City." Looking back, I'm almost shocked by my fears of exploring new places, and I'm still a little embarrassed about sharing those fears with the Interwebs. I may no longer be the young woman who's "scared shitless in the big city," but I don't mind admitting that no matter how long I live in Chicago, I'll still be that same "small town" girl who listens to Fiona and enjoys hanging out with my cats in the comfort of my home.
A prophecy is attached to each of the twenty year Katun cycles. Each cycle starts on the day of the Ancestors, Ajpu or Ahau as Ancestors are known to the Yucatec Maya. The first 20-year cycle starts with 11 Ahau.
- Stuffing
Background: She's participating in one of the Seattle Shakespeare Company's Short Shakes programs. She's been interested in doing this since STUN went to the adult company's production of "Romeo and Juliet" last fall. They had pictures up from a previous Short Shakes group, and it looked like a LOT of fun. So, we signed her up.
Wipe my tears, into the future sublime
Considering that the school board basically told Dynasty it was his fault for being bullied because he comes off as being too gay, I think they know why he was being bullied and what was happening to him just wasn’t important to them.
I want to take a moment to give my mother a little credit, too. She is a retired hospital-based midwife and was my doula through the ordeal and was a great source of support. I spent a lot of transition alternating between clinging to her and DH. I remember at one point begging her to help me, and she told me “No one can do this for you, honey. This is your mountain to climb. And you are.”
I'm presently very excited and very nervous about this coming Thursday. The Third Thursday celebration in downtown Pittsfield, Mass., will serve as both the culmination of almost three years of work (if you can call it that) as well as the springboard to future celebrations of the legacy of papermaking in the Upper Housatonic National Heritage Area.
You are one with all that surrounds you – the Earth, the trees, the flowers, the sky, the birds, the animals, with all insects and with all sentient life.
Tanaka’s second title win…
Attendee Dial-in #: (712) 432-1001
Take back the lies
We arrived at 5.30am after the big schlep through the skies from Auckland to Dubai, feeling a tad worse for wear. It was still dark when we reached the hotel down by the Creek area of the city (the old beating heart of this now changed-beyond-recognition Emirate). Faced with the prospect of not being able to get into our rooms for some hours yet, we were persuaded to buy access to the Executive Suite so we could have breakfast and hang out for a while. We even managed a quick dip in the rooftop pool with its magnificent vista of the cityscape stretching onto the horizon.
A £175m scheme to transform a 12-acre site near Huddersfield town centre into "The Waterfront Quarter", with 500 apartments, offices, shops, restaurants, and a hotel, has been given conditional permission by Kirklees Council.
12. Blue And Gold
Bad Teacher is little more than a story of what one woman will do to get bigger breasts. In order to add the smallest minutia of depth, the filmmakers add in Jason Segel’s character: a gym teacher who is attracted to Elizabeth. This addition is so weak, though, that Bad Teacher would have been better off without it. If the characters were more fleshed out, and some reasons were given for his or her actions, this thin layer of depth may have had a stronger impact. As it is, there are a lot of one-dimensional characters that are difficult to care about.
Be still my beating heart..... how amazing is this house and how lucky are the people who live here! I have never seen an outdoor porch like it, it certainly would be an experience sitting wrapped in rugs on a winter's day in front of that fireplace.
We often used to go into Ambleside if it was raining (which it frequently does in the Lake District!) to do some shopping, have a pub lunch, and then spent half the afternoon in one of the coffee shops.
Experts at the University of California at San Diego made the discovery by studying mice and human cells cultured in their laboratory.
Mindfulness. Easier than it sounds. Today I searched for the gap. That gap between the end of a thought and the start of the next.
But we have to learn to look at them differently. To look at them from the inside out. Last week I interviewed the architect Frederic Druot. He has collaborated with Lacaton+Vassal on the study PLUS, establishing a method by which such buildings can be renovated. They currently have a project on site, the renovation of the Tour Bois-le-Pretre in Paris. They photographed the interior of every flat. When they present the project to people, and show some of these images, people are shocked - it suddenly hits home that these deeply personal interior spaces are what has been threatened with demolition - rather than an abstract and distant concrete block.
The sound of horns and motors, which shall bring
After study is complete at Vesta, Dawn will move onto Ceres.
The awards will be in three fields, the first one will be in the cultural field. It is related to the varied cultural works and writings in specialisations of human and social horizons in general, for instance language, history, heritage, philosophy, translation and intellectual studies. The second one is art field. It is related to the artist work production in its different international aspects, such as music, fine arts, sculpture, photography and painting.
Serves at least 8
My sister still makes prizes for little boys and girls; she runs a preschool. As for the boys and girls who swam and ran and jumped at that first Pleasant Lake Olympiad, they now have children of their own. A few weeks ago I watched the latest crop of young athletes run, jump, swim and collect their prizes. No one stayed up all night sewing little ribbons but the competitive spirit was still strong and thrill that comes from victory was still there.
Okay. How many of you described yourself with individual talents/abilities/traits?
I used to like him when I still thought he was normal. I was fond of him and had fun. I joked with him. I used to call him Dirk, and Kiddo, Steamshovel, Dinky Boy, and Dicky Dare. Till I found out what he was. Now it’s always formal: Derek. (You prick.)
Metal trinket: BoBunny
Have you ever heard of Charles Cosimano AKA Uncle Chuckie?
Row 500m
If you want to show your support for a colleague or friend, or even your local Police, read up on the Winsor report, show your support by signing the e-petitions on line, and joining us in London on 10th May 2012. Don’t have the ‘it’s not going to make a difference attitude’, it will. We need a voice, and by going you are our voice. @inspjulietbravo (twitter) #antiwinsornetwork
Friday July 15th 2011- This was one of the most exciting days for us! We did a doors off helicopter ride with Jack Harter's Helicopters. I sat next to the pilot and Mike right beside me. Behind us was a sweet and older couple on their honeymoon who happened to be from Colorado. Clark and Jerri. Sweet, sweet people. She had been coming to Kauai for quite sometime and also gave us the insight on all the must see spots. This is a definite must do! A great way to see the island. Again, magical. I have never seen so many waterfalls. It was as though it was raining waterfalls. They were everywhere. Our pilot flew us over the "grand canyon of Kauai" and also over the famous Napali Coast. Absolutely incredible (I think I said "incredible"about 30 times each day.) We went into canyons and there was one point where it felt like we could touch the mountain. After that unbelievable adventure we decided to explore the beach by our hotel. Just a brief walk and we found ourselves literally alone on an awesome beach. We swam for a bit and then went to lunch at a place called Island Palm Island Style where we met Rose, our server. She is seriously Mike's Hawaiian soul mate. She was telling us how she golfs with her golf buddies about 3 times a week and her husband always gives her the ok (he doesn't golf.) We were laughing because 99% of the time it's the other way around. We talked to her quite a bit about Kauai and she suggested a great steakhouse at the Hyatt for dinner the following night. Once we got back to our hotel we sat by the pool for a bit and headed to a Luau called Luau Kalamaku. I'm going to be completely honest when I say that the food was terrible, but the show was amazing. I think next time we will try and do a more intimate Luau and not with 700 other guests. But it was a definite must do and was a great way to see and learn more about the culture. The young Hawaiian girls were not only beautiful, but were so sweet. All of the locals were. This was the one night that we decided to leave the top off of the jeep and of course it rained pretty hard while we were inside at the Luau. It made for a good laugh and it did dry rather quickly!
- Carrie will be going under in Beirut and Brody will encounter a beautiful, Middle-Eastern woman in the second season of Homeland.
I do need a fourth light I found. The above photo has the ceiling light on (replaced the incandescent). I was not sure if that glare was going to be too much so tried a few shots without it on, just the side lights, as below.
At the epicentre of the nexus of talent that includes Chase & Status, Nero, Wretch 32, Skream and Benga, Gleave fervently feels that the mainstream success of the UK’s homegrown urban/bass scene represents a year zero for British music.
Kaplan, R., & Kaplan, S. (1989). The experience of nature: A psychological perspective. New York: Cambridge University Press.
Here’s what happened: Dean takes a swig from Bobby’s flask and the man himself, more or less, appears and tells them that he’s figured out the leviathans’ master plan. Cure all diseases so the critters can have an all you can eat buffet of healthy humans. It doesn’t seem so bad, really, losing the threat of disease, when the trade-off is that maybe you’ll die by getting eaten instead. I mean, isn’t that kind of how natural immunities crop up in humans, by evolution that makes us vulnerable to some other type of disease? Anyway, while they’re discussing Dick, they get an e-mail from the dearly departed Frank, informing them that someone is hacking into his harddrive. They track the signal and find that it’s coming from Candy Mountain… The Death Star… I mean Richard Roman Enterprises.
Sweet malty aroma, caramel.
We, the media-consuming populace, have come a long way since the folks who mistook Orson Welles’ War of the Worlds radio drama for a live broadcast of an alien invasion. We’ve become far more cynical, far more dubious of the relationship between media and reality. Ever since we “went postmodern” at some unspecified point in the ‘90s, we have demanded that the illusion-weavers at Hollywood either stay one step ahead of us or go postmodern themselves. The latter option, postmodernism, has come to represent a sizable chunk of today’s films, particularly those aimed at young, media-savvy audiences: films that concede their filminess, positioning themselves as either cutesy and self-referential (e.g. Scott Pilgrim) or dour deconstructions of popular fantasies (e.g. The Dark Knight). What movies that acknowledge themselves as movies have in common is that they’re not in much of a position to scare us, because movies themselves aren’t really any scarier than the discs (or reels, or hard drives, or tapes, or whatever) they come on. The other option—staying one step ahead of the audience—seems to be considered a lost cause, not only because the propagation of social media and nerdy Internet humor sites have rendered it nearly impossible for even the slightest plot hole or scientific inaccuracy to go unnoticed, but because Hollywood has always been of the belief that reality isn’t very conducive to drama. Moviegoers want movies that feel real, they say, but they don’t actually want them to be too real. Reality is boring, right? That’s why people go to the movies.
I thought my outfit could instantly become a little more special with the Coach wedges. Are they not gorgeous? I am also sure the Mr. wouldn't mind me leaving them out if he could have a man office that resembled this. It would add the feminine touch that every room needs.
6. Tuck Jumps – 5
What does concerns me is that if it’s not carried out and applied carefully, you could end up in the situation where people are indiscriminately stopped who are absolute citizens. … America is a lot like Disney World in that once you get a ticket, you’re in. You don’t have to keep showing your ticket to keep riding the rides. That’s the whole point of liberty.
And then, as I stood up, I saw a woman screaming and people running to her, including several security people. I called out to Elie and Lauren to tell them something was happening - it clearly looked like some sort of medical emergency and my automatic response was to turn to Elie. He took off - Lauren behind him (impressive considering she was wearing a long skirt and climbing down). Elie called out to tell me to take over the barbecue as he ran down the side.
With thanks to Denise Nesbitt, who created ABC.For more interesting ABC posts click on the logo in the sidebar or Here. This week we are looking for words beginning with N.
I brought the book with me. There might be time in the parking lot to read a few pages while he unbuckled himself to get out of the car.
I hope you’ll play along with this week’s challenge for your chance to win some Cat Cash. Just upload your project to the photo album on Alma’s blog to enter—and be sure to keep an eye out for the links to the rest of the Cat Pack’s projects that she’ll be posting throughout the week.
Field Journal: Added stickers to our mammal divider card and added a whole bunch of mammal cards to Boo's Field Journal. I found some free printables at National Geographic Kids and downloaded 99% of them. It took FOREVER, but they were free and very informative. (More posts to come explaining this field journal- it is going to be a collection of all animal types and habitats- so stay tuned for that!)
That's my story on how and why I choose Et Cetera as my blog name. What's yours?
As an aside, Corbin was a former student of mine, and I am thrilled to hear he's beating his battle with cancer.
I have no blanket
In Old Town Manassas there are commemorative flags hanging on every lamp post as far as the eye can see. It's a lovely place to walk around. There are lots of wonderful old buildings that house Shops and Restaurants with outside dining near the old historic train station.
So I would like to see a Christmas card with the Jolly old guy on it
Do you choose partners for your students?
And sleeping alone in the tent felt perfectly comfortable. Something did wake me up around 4 in the morning, and I lay awake for a while wondering if the end was in sight. But I eventually fell back asleep. Once it got light, I could see what the noise was:
MY Vacation is over so its back to work I go in the morning. However thankfully I will be off for about five days counting the weekend for Christmas.
Plainly this hasn't happened, except of course in the upper classes, which go by their own rules. For a thoughtful person today to believe that these social-engineering nostrums will (for example) bring black crime rates to a level indistinguishable from white crime rates, involves a strenuous act of what Orwell called "doublethink"—massive self-deception. Does anyone, after all those decades, all those trillions of dollars, all those failed social-engineering experiments, does anyone really, honestly still believe in the nostrums? I don't.
The slogging sadness in the line, "...and sometimes I'd hang my head and cry"...
with a smirk he emerges from the east
Grading Scale:
FIRST KNIGHT (John Box; Malcolm Stone)
Mandy Slater – Emergency Service #2
We subdued them with Ben and Jerrys and I am not sure why I didn't take a picture when J's ended up on the sidewalk. (Of course there was swimming, drinking and eating, but no pictures so you can use your imagination.)
Article 51
I was blessed by a colleague who called me the other day. She was calling to talk about something related to work and before we launched into all of that, I wanted to ask her how she was doing. She said that she was feeling tired and that the feeling wasn’t coming from being overworked but from something else. She felt that she wasn’t showing up fully – in the ways that made her feel good about herself and her work product. Wow! This is exactly how I have been feeling.
Being new to the blog community and a little bit challenged when it comes to common sense, I have only just realised what it is I have to do when an award has been passed to me by another blogger. It’s almost bedtime now but, tomorrow, I shall properly accept the awards and, more importantly, pass them along to other bloggers.
I am experiencing an extended period of frustration with my fellow Angelenos. Every day I'm on the road and stuck in traffic is another day that I feel like pulling away from society. Leaving them all behind and finding somewhere to just be alone. I feel like retreating into the wilderness or what's left of the wilderness.
oh something like this.
Postdoctoral Fellowship (Post 1)
As it says in one of my favorite hymns:
Given the importance of the occasion, I treated Cathy to some new cosmetics. She's a drugstore makeup type of gal, but there's quite a selection in the drugstore these days.
Okay, so this show is pretty much surface junk and a guilty pleasure for chuckles. But it continues to make me laugh, especially the one scene when Nick attempts to cut his own hair. I laughed out-frikin-LOUD:
Earlier this week, Santos finally came out supporting the legalization of soft drugs, such as marijuana. In an interview published by Metro World News, Santos said that he favors legalization “provided everyone does it at the same time.” However, Santos balked at the idea of being the first sitting president to propose this in an international forum, citing mostly political reasons: “I would be crucified if I took the first step,” he said.
Unfortunately they rub my heel a little, so it'll take some more breaking in to see if they'll be a suitable replacement.
The King’s Speech
I felt the cool breeze blow inside the car.
To make the filling, toss sliced apples with lemon juice and brown sugar in a large mixing bowl. Sprinkle about half of the cornstarch over apples. Add spices and stir gently to combine. After the mixture sits for a while, if it looks like there is too much liquid, add remaining cornstarch to thicken.
What are you chewing on today?
And speaking of school, I'm thrilled to say we have only 20 days left. These last 2 months are the hardest and most definitely the longest. Once again I'm looking forward to summer vacation and some serious daily painting.
“Where have you been, Bev Pettersen? Any lover of the heart-jolting world of horse-racing will love this debut romantic mystery by the super-talented Ms. Pettersen.” - Pamela Callow, author of the Kate Lange thriller series.
I also got to meet Mark Patton. I may not like Freddy’s Revenge, but I started to really admire him after seeing Never Sleep Again and I like him even more after the Scream Queen panel. I didn’t meet Amanda Wyss...she’d had shoulder surgery fairly recently and I didn’t want to bother her or make her sign anything. I thought it was incredibly awesome (and brave) of her to come anyway, but I just couldn’t put her in any more pain than a weekend of signing and photos and accidental brushings had already. I will meet her at some point! Besides, I have to tell her how awesome she was in CSI (as Donna Marks AND as Tina Vincent!)
2) A species or subspecies presently unknown to science in the living state, but which is known to have existed in historical times and allegedly still persists today (e.g. thylacine).
Type II: A common supernova type, usually found in the spiral arms of galaxies and not in elliptical galaxies, they are distinguished by the presence of hydrogen in their spectrum. These are known to be caused by the rapid collapse and violent explosion of a massive star. There exists several subcategories of Type II supernova, including II-L, which has a steady, linear decline in light over time; II-P which has a slower decline (a plateau) followed by normal decay; IIn, the "n" denotes narrow, which have narrow hydrogen emission lines in their spectrum (probably caused by blue variable stars); and IIb, which initially resembles a Type II supernova but later has a spectrum resembling Type Ib.
I know a little about topsy-turveydom at my house right now, as the wind sweeps through and blows the dust around. But the task at hand was anything but chaotic, in fact, these marshmallows were the simplest specimens of their kind that I've ever made. As I sifted the potato-starch-and-confectioners-sugar coating over them, I felt the quiet satisfaction of the snow globe, the mastering of my tiny universe.
04 Twilight Alehouse (Top Gear, 25 September 1972)
The world will exploit its centuries’ worth of shale gas and shale oil until the time in the future when we have reliable and cost-effective renewables which don’t cost a fortune and disfigure the landscape. Meanwhile, there is no need to tip taxpayers' money into this distant dream. Government's spending way too much already and renewables just ain't urgent.
Starting in 2008, he is just part of my regular yearly album.
cracked pepper to taste and set aside.
Handmade ear wires enhance earrings. Making your own ear wires will add value to your jewelry designs, allow you to create exactly what you need for any given project and save you money. Ear wires are easy to make. This tutorial will explain how to make a simple ear hook for pierced ears.
Posted by F.R Newbrough on April 30, 2012 at 12:30am
* Because of the no cable thing I've had time to read more. I am reading Dreams of Joy by Lisa See. She also wrote Shanghai Girls and Snow Flower and the Secret Fan. Both very good books.
Karla: I hope they’re going to be hot angels! Do you write full-time, or balance writing with a day job?
In addition to being the first sock I've done on round needles, it's also my first toe-up sock - yay for new techniques.
We just looked at him perplexed and said “no”
Row 15: Knit 1 stitch, knit 2 stitches together, knit 1 stitch, purl 1 stitch, knit 1 stitch, knit 2 stitches together, knit 1 stitch. (7 stitches)
The price of the Fremont Solyndra building is not listed on the website set up to help sell the property. Calls this evening to the realtor were not answered.
“In all three of these cases, EPA initially made headline-grabbing statements either insinuating or proclaiming outright that the use of hydraulic fracturing by American energy producers was the cause of water contamination, but in each case their comments were premature at best – and despite their most valiant efforts, they have been unable to find any sound scientific evidence to make this link.”
We urge anyone who wants to sign these petitions, and hasn’t so far, to do so by following either of the two links below.
Helen liked the cookies so much that she asked me to make them again for her out-of-town wedding guests and wedding party - she was putting together a welcome package for all of them and wanted to include these cookies. So I made the cookies again for her out-of-town wedding guests, and slipper (flip-flop) cookies for her wedding party.
"Hey Vannah," she said.
I used the CraftGeek Pin It on my card. I created a border along the bottom of my card. Before I attached the pins, I heat embossed them to change up the color. As you can see in my photos below, it's a very simple process. Heat embossing allows you to change the pins into any color of your choice.
Tonight we had tons of trick-or-treaters!
Finally, at the start of our 4th year in business, we're back on the track that led us to this point and we're happy to introduce 100% cotton (GOTS certified organic) canvas prints in these fabulous bold designs- and what's even more new is I've even added more color ways! More details on the site.
* You will need to have a blog and update it regularly, at least once a week.
Arsenal still hadn’t settled, but drew level all the same. Song won the ball in midfield and the ball was played forward via Walcott and Rosicky to Van Persie on the edge of the area, who turned inside and nudged it behind the QPR backline for Walcott. He curled his first effort onto the right post, but showed impressive calmness to turn the rebound home.
Golly, that was a lot of pictures. This is the longest post I've ever done! Here's a couple of bonus pictures.
at Michaels Craft Store
The struggle for dominance over Western society came to a head in the middle of the 20th century. Whites waged a cataclysmic, fratricidal war on each other and lost. Long before that war, even while Whites still dominated the US politically, jews were already helping blacks found the NAACP and pathologizing White racial identity.
For in my union with Christ Jesus! God has blessed me by giving me every spiritual blessing in the Heavenly World. He has put His stamp of ownership on me by giving me The Holy Spirit He has promised! Amen!
Peachy Keen face Assortment donated by Peachy Keen
Thai-style Coconut Curry Oatmeal Cookies paired with Oatmeal Pale Ale
We also have medical opinions that HSV-1 causes various degrees of brain damage and that the vast majority of those cases are not noticeable until long after the circumcision, and we have the very real problem of non-reporting and of covering up of reporting, both of which clearly happen. If anyone thinks Sha’arei Tzedek Hospital or Laniado Hospital are accurately reporting the number and severity of MBP HSV1 cases they get, I’ve got some very fertile land in the Mojave Desert I’d like to sell you. The same is true for Bnei Brak’s doctors and hospitals.
Source: Genesis 41, 37 – 45
♥Lumps
Wont Quit, Till Im A-Rod (I’m not taking up tennis) and Da Game
Part of the difficulty with Obama’s speech is he, and his team of assistants, is careful to not be caught in an obvious lie. However Obama is an expert at bending the truth and spinning facts in such a way as to achieve his purpose. We live in an age where propaganda is so pervasive it is hardly recognized, and the sheeple often swallow whatever line they are fed. So I will go through his speech point by point.
Maybe I'll have to start up on of those "what I wore today" blogs.
allow you to stretch more comfortably and hold that stretch longer!
Life in Spey Bay
The elites see only good in ethics but find fault in us. They pretend they are “essentially good,” while we are essentially bad. Unfortunately many immigrants keep letting them down by shooting and knifing people, grooming our young girls and planting bombs.
2nd set:
~Anonymous
At 3pm our room was ready so we headed to #639, which is a corner room and has a nice wrap around balcony, so we could peek at the ocean in addition to enjoying the city/mountain views.
It is but our way to deny responsibility,
You open a fresh word document, a blank sheet of paper to begin again, and this greets you…
After announcing they planned to buy a dog as a reward for their daughters being such good sports about the grueling campaign, animal rights and animal welfare groups started campaigns of their own — for the Obamas to adopt a shelter dog and not buy a dog from a breeder. More
Arthur Darvill, tell stories.
Well, why not get all of your followers in one place once a week? This is the place to do just that!
1 irony
It falls to me to speak once more.
The healing crisis will usually bring about past conditions. People often forget the diseases or injuries they have had in the past, but are usually reminded during the crisis.
Adam’s photographs are distinguished not only by their economy and lucidity but also by their mixture of grief and hope. On the one hand, his pictures acknowledge an impoverishing loss of space and silence, and the opportunity they provided for focus; they also record the inhumanity of much that has been built and the ferocity of our attack upon the environment. On the other hand, they remain alert to the startling eloquence of trees, the signs of caring and joy in people despite their circumstances, and the redemptive power that sunlight continues to have even as it falls across sprawling suburbs.
Free song;
The big kids have been dressed, fed, combed, kissed and sent out the door to school. The T.V. is playing Sesame Street for Libby and Elliott is hanging out in his bouncy seat, happy as a clam.
Waiter! Could I have another shot of Glenfiddich? Neat.
Junior: What if you haven't got any hands?
I'll miss her when she's gone on to bigger and better things in a new forever home, but Luca would be glad to get his spot on the couch back.
— post #1390
My last "what should I read next" poll had a clear winner with Throne of the Crescent Moon, which has already been receiving high marks (I liked it as well, but that comes later). Being a bit of a contrarian I wanted to also pay some service to the low-runner in the poll: Faith by John Love. Why was it the low-runner? I suspect it has to do with the book being Sci-Fi while most of the others were Fantasy of one stripe or another. Fantasy still trumps Sci-Fi in terms of fandom, in the US at least, but it really shouldn't especially with something as special and different as John Love's debut Faith.
That is, in favor of reading as many of them as possible.
Chapter I
As I blogged, I've had opportunities to meet people and to work alongside several businesses. I've learned so much as I've read others' blog posts and prepared my own. I'm also excited to share about innovative business ventures I've gotten to promote.
What is the Mighty Coala?
but I went ahead and bought it still.
Today I received a note home from school. Enrollment packs for 2012 are available for collection at the office. It dawned on me, as it has been slowly dawning on me since the beginning of the year, that this is my last year with a small child at home.
I hate it too.
You should be able to click on the linked brew names above for the detailed recipe. You can also click here or go to the link on my Homebrew Page to see all of my recipes at Hopville.com. If anyone has any questions about my recipes (past or present) or need help with homebrewing shoot me a line. I’ll do my best to get you up and brewing.
I really enjoyed Joe Danger and the follow up plays it safe in terms of gameplay, with great stunts and lots of combos. What changes here is that not every level is bike based – there are mine carts, skis and more besides as Joe shoots scenes for a film. Brilliant fun and with the game moving to XBox 360 as well even more people will be able to enjoy it.
Tough as nails, combined with a heart of gold.........
“Firstly, massive credit to Backsteppo and Zenl for the original cloak meshes used in this mod, and for giving me permission to make use of them – I’m just the bod who wanted to add them to levelled lists and whatnot!
It was amazing! Not only was the food perfect, the wine good and the service first class….but the atmosphere in and around the restaurant was incredible. Darling Harbour is one of my favorite parts of town, especially at night.
Elsewhere, driveways are dusted off and called car parks, that’ll be a fiver, please; limos fill lay-bys; opening hours are rapidly extended; normal old breakfasts at cafes are dubbed Racing Breakfasts and charged double. The police milk the moment by buggering up the traffic at roundabouts. It certainly adds a buzz and, apart from being stranded this side of Cheltenham by dint of the queues, I love it but this year is the first time I have actually been. Yes. Mrs Very Rich had some chums to stay and a spare Members’ Ticket was going begging, so what do you do but dust off your frock and toddle along.
How was I to know that this little man could bring such an amazing change to my world - from the very first time I knew he was there he won my heart and sealed the deal on his arrival - it was love at first sight!
Logan wore his crown and carried his scepter to the interview - I had made the crown by sewing triangle bits of felt to the bit I had cut off my jeans when I hemmed them. It took me less than an hour to make the crown, and that includes having to search through a gazillion totes to find the felt!
Only, I leave out the juicy parts.
This builds on some of the themes explored in my report for NESTA, in particular issues of inclusion, media habits and the merits of particular business models.
-”you mean you’re happy .”
And I could wait patiently but I really wish you would…
The way the image is presented, with the character literally and physically confined to a frame within a frame - with the world, this backdrop of squalor and human suffering surrounding her, out of focus, but still dominating the screen - deliberately establishes this character as a prisoner; not just to the world and this situation that she's created, but to a particular state of mind.
Anyway, back to Russell. His family and my family were friends and Russell and I were the same age. We stayed at the same babysitter’s house since they didn’t have formal preschool in those days. Sometimes when our parents would go out together in the evenings, they’d drop us off at the sitter’s house and we’d either stay until our parents got back or spend the night. Russell and I had a blast together ’cause I’d been raised so much like a boy by my father that I didn’t mind getting muddy in the yard or trying to catch crawfish with my bare hands in the ditch at the end of the road and I watched all of the TV shows that the rest of the guys liked. I fit right in. Heck, my babysitter figured I “fit-in” well enough that I do have the memory of bath time at her house one night.
“Where’s our father?” Allen asked looking around suspiciously. Connar gestured impatiently.
and high-traffic delivery applications in Production built on WCS platforms,
As the veil thins and the worlds merge, the new world order will support honor and respect and joy and love.
Know that the progress we have made and the increases in achievement we have realized are, ultimately, the result of the work you do each and every day in the classroom. What goes on in our schools is the most important factor influencing student success.
Conclusion: The food here is very fresh, very tasty, well presented and I doubt you can go wrong with any of their dishes; my only complaint is their prices. My wife says her meal was worth the money and I think therein lies the issue, they have priced up all the meat dishes well, but when it came to the vegetarian dishes instead of looking at what they were giving the customer they just looked at the general prices across the menu and said “well, there’s no meat, so just knock a couple of quid off and keep them somewhat inline with the rest of the prices on the menu”. A simple fix to that of course is not to change the prices, but to just give a little more on the veggie plates where the meat would have been. There is no denying the food here is good. We’ll be back again, but with prices like these I don’t think it will be for a long time. If you’re in the area and want really good food and have money to throw around here is the place to pop into – if you just want a meal and don’t want to break the bank its probably best to pop over to the huntsman across the road. Whilst the staff didn’t mind at all I would say The Swan Inn attracts a certain type of customer who don’t really want to be bothered by children, so I would say only take the kids if they’re older or if younger, well behaved. Lastly the menu did lack options on it, it would have been really good to see a veggie burger on there because there’s no way for a veggie to have any onion rings, handcut chips or any of the niceties that come accompained with the other meals (had I been alone I would never have been able to compliment the delcious homemade coleslaw). So a homemade veggie burger option would be much welcomed. Other than that I would recommend coming in when the restaurant is open as by the looks of that menu, whilst still expensively priced, there are more options for us veg-heads.
Time : 9.30 am until 1:00 pm
Animal rights activist, author, “The Case for Animal Rights”, “The Struggle for Animal Rights,” “The Yes Generation”
As I said at the beginning, sometimes things go so wonderfully fast you just have to shake your head and wonder how one person can be so blessed.
is just right for the veil and tiara! The little verse is on the same stamp.
I will probably fly again at some point but it isn’t something that I look forward to doing. The point of relaxation does not begin at the airport but probably a day after you have reached your destination. Is it worth it? I’ve always thought it was but as time goes on I think more about it. I was so very lucky to see so many countries when I was a kid, I know I didn’t appreciate it then. It will never be the same and that is one dreadful loss. I’m glad my dad is no longer on this earth to witness travel the way it is now, he would be horrified, as those of us who remember “the good old days” are.
Fran:
This is great news for Boo if he accepts the position... And he most likely will.
I'm A Boy
yet pray to never see, and wouldn’t,
your card.
But through this embarrassing "before" photo, I wanted to inspire other real people, and show you it can be done. I'm down 45 pounds. I'm 5'8" and weighed 250, and now I'm at 205 with 35ish to go.
cause its pupils are so ignorant of the merest rudiments.” -C.H. Ward
Campagnolo Nuovo Record derailleurs and downtube shifters.
If you are ever in the St. Louis, MO area I HIGHLY recommend you visit the museum!
2 PM
2 tbsp finely chopped coriander leaves
But today I couldn’t move on. I stood there listening to Jesus address the unseen one speaking through Peter. Whether Satan knew the whole plan or not, Jesus had just announced part of it. Satan knew that it was the will and the plan of the Most High God for Jesus to go to Jerusalem, be killed and then be raised to life.
When you open a bottle of Johnnie Walker Blue Label prepare to taste one of the best blended scotch in the world. At $220 for a 750ml bottle it better be a kick in the face good, slap on the back OMG good, or in the words of our friend Mike “This ain’t your momma’s whiskey!” This scotch is very smooth with many layers of complexity and creates a sixth sense that craves for more. With a confident hint of a “burnt rubber band” flavor the Blue Label has a smoothness and flavor not experienced in many blends you find today.
I made 6 burp clothes total.
I think they turned out really nicely. My niece is going to take a photo of the banner at the party - I didn't want to put it all together since I have to ship it off to her on the east coast. You'll have to wait for that photo! Until then - big birthday hugs to our little Jackosaurus!
I always enjoy when my readers take the time to provide a little feedback to my periodic ramblings. It’s a great pleasure to see what various random people think of me and my humble efforts.
I'm completed thrilled to post this blog, for many, many reasons. I don't remember when I first had contact with Annie--I think it was after I read Operating Instructions (though I had been following her career since All New People). But what I do remember is, before I gave birth to my son, I had a miscarriage at three months and people were saying all sorts of ridiculous things to me, like "At least you didn't know the baby," or, "Why'd you have a kid at your age, anyway" I just felt I had to talk to her, and I called and left a message (or maybe I wrote a letter, I don't remember) and then immediately felt like an idiot, because who was I to intrude on her time? I went out to sulk and when I came back there was this ten minute, hilariously funny, incredibly warm message on my answering machine from Annie. It was the first time I laughed since the miscarriage.
Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Lavrov said there are a lot of persons who want to bury Annan’s Plan before being born, and opposition powers seek foreign interference, pointing out that these powers hinder Annan’s plan.
Ultimately adoption leave is for a totally different reason than maternity leave, although bonding is a huge part of both types of leave. No we don't have the physical aspects to recover from (although it's hard to describe how physically and emotionally draining the introduction period is) but the children have a huge amount of adjustment to do. Their whole world changes in a matter of weeks. Can you imagine how you would cope with such changes? Having a carer at home for at least a year is considered essential for helping a child bond and adjust to the change in their circumstances and ensure that they understand who their primary carers are. I've now been home with Katie for nearly 2 years and am glad that I took the decision not to return to work because she is benefitting so much from being with me. You can't just move a child and put them into daycare. The confusion would be enormous!
For women, revenue numbers were not as good as for men at either non-employer or employer firms. At the more economically important employer firms, average revenues at male-owned businesses increased 14.6 percent in real terms from 2002 to 2007, as opposed to 10.1 percent for women-owned businesses.
2 3/4 out of 5 – Violence – Nikki has a bad dream in which she’s at a party (actually, the first party she attended) dressed as a chocolate bar, but actually begins melting into thick and warm chocolatey goo as the people surrounding her do nothing but laugh or salvage her body parts as fruit dip. Mackenzie and posse are usually verbally cruel to Nikki making derogatory remarks at her direction, and one of Mackenzie’s posse members, Jessica, smashes a plate of chocolate at Nikki and ruins her new dress. And by new, I mean they-literally-bought-it-that-day new. Brianna repeatedly wakes up Nikki in the dead of night in a very dangerous fashion: poking at her eye. Nikki imagines that Brianna’s method could lead to her waking up to see her detached eye looking back at her on her pillow.
This sounds so formal that it's off-putting. And it's not enticing. Start with the name of the main character. Tell me what challenges he faces.
2. People need to realize what is truly taking place in America. Is it really a battle for rights, tax breaks, marital recognition, etc…? I submit to you that it is not about those things. Those are a means to an end. The end is to normalize homosexuality as acceptable. If you have ever taken a sociology class then you are familiar with the term social norm. The goal is a changing of the social norms within American culture.
Which leads effortlessly into a shameless plug for the gigs I'm doing at The Carlyle Institute starting in January. Two hours; six beers; small classes; lots of cheery-beery banter and only limited quantities of awful puns.
DaaS to data consumers because it allows for the separation of data cost and usage from that of a specific software or platform.
I was smart, this time, I think. I have organized this house in a way that will mean minimum disruption. Furniture from the storage unit, much of what’s in the office, a few things from my bedroom and I’m good to go. I have left my house relatively undisturbed, to lessen the shock when I come back for less-frequent visits.
GLENN CLOSE (THE WORLD ACCORDING TO GARP)
So go forth and share your work. (And once you do, leave me a link in the comments!)
36.- Know that mothers have as powerful an influence over the welfare of future generations as all other earthly causes combined.
And this is my current project....
The Development Control Group of the URA puts out detailed Development Control Parameters that guide what can and cannot be developed in Singapore, depending on the type of development the area is zoned for. Broadly speaking, we can classify it into two major parts, Residential and Non-Residential developments.
He covers self-esteem in relation to relationships, provides research results on how it affects progress in school, and debunks myths about the negatives and positives of high self-esteem.
From afar, it’s hard to get a grasp as to what is really happening there. In many ways I believe the teams and media, were kept fairly secluded at Bahrain International Circuit, well away from the actual reality. There was just news today that journalists had been arrested following yesterday’s Formula 1 and GP2 races. Ultimately Bahrain has a long way to go and one glamorized event, is little more than a bandage covering the wound. Where the sport was successful, was in it’s ability to remain neutral. Just get on with the race and that’s exactly what they did.
Colossians 3:15 (NIV): “Let the peace of Christ rule in your hearts, since as members of one body you were called to peace. And be thankful.”
The Apple iPad is being talked about as the saviour of newspapers by publishers and commentators around the world. While it will take some time to understand whether the iPad will deliver a bankable revenue stream to newspaper publishers, the bigger question for newspaper retailers is whether the iPad will impact on newspaper buying habits.
Because we are all connected.
Mobile Museum of Art, Mobile, AL (as of 9-7). Tommy Arthur McPherson, executive director, reported that the museum sustained no major damage. Some outdoor sculptures were blown over and trees are down. The museum reopened offices on 9-6.
I'm not nuts about Turzai's bill, and if some changes aren't made, I can't support it; I'm hopeful that it will get better. I did take the opportunity to ask if the bill takes away the Police-Enforced Monopoly. It does not, but Turzai said the Monopoly is not enforced (though he did admit that there are occasional instances when it is...usually having to do with personal issues with a local cop in a border town), and would not be enforced. I don't like that, I'd much rather see it formally done away with. That's one of the things I'll be pushing for. More to come on that, but about Newman...
BSS: (cher singing) "Yesss I doooooo, believe in Love... and, the sound of my own voice."
Today I have a very special and pretty pink to show you. This is Orly Artificial Sweetener from their Cool Romance Spring 2012 collection. Although I liked all colours in that collection, this pink stood out the most.
LipstickNotes
Stir a bit more, turn off heat, cover and return an hour later. Rinse.
Our next challenge is Monday so be sure to check back here. We have an added incentive to the prize package..... Not telling yet. Check back on Monday and you will see...
Peanut Butter………. and Jelly
Still we knew the moment had to come our forms would lift and separate. With that, we lie and gather up our selves, the places took before the southern wind— but like each storm, it's written that we must collide again.
Democratic Gov. Jerry Brown announced on Saturday that the state’s deficit has ballooned to $16 billion, a huge increase over his $9.2-billion estimate in January. See LA Times, Fox News, or Bloomberg.
Turkish national Onur Yildirim, 26, has pleaded guilty to two charges of sexual penetration of a 16-year-old child who was under his care, supervision and authority.
JASON
Adirondack Brewery
Finding beauty in nature which is so easy to do around these parts..
-let me listen to their other earbud and i heard “nfc”, their album: dinafest…
The answer is not only better background checks but accurate record keeping that can be reviewed by other family members, a court or agency at any time. Our company, eGuardianship.comwww.eGuardianship.com has pioneered the nation’s first online real-time reporting system for wards. Such systems ensure proper recordkeeping and help to minimize if not eliminate fraud.
And they can rock too: ‘Shelley’ cooks with Stonesy guitars, ‘I’m the One’ takes us back to the humid Melbourne days of Camilleri’s hit band, Jo Jo Zep and The Falcons, ‘Waitin for the Hammer’ bristles with Stax soul excitement. Unlike too many double- or triple-album sets (of which it is often said that they would have made one great single album), every song here counts; the riches on Crooked Little Thoughts are many and varied. The moods, colours and stories here are tied together by something as simple as ‘heart’ – all the characters, streets, towns, kisses and sads are real, and very human.
Emerging from their often unsavory reputation of the recent past, tattoos have gained increasing prominence in the past decade. Life magazine estimated in 1936 that 10 million Americans, or approximately 6% of the population had at least one tattoo. A Harris Poll, done in 2003, nearly triples those numbers and estimates that 16% of Americans now have one or more tattoos. For a complete breakdown of the Harris Poll numbers, see below.
Who am I kidding? If I know you as well as I think I do you'll look it up on the Internet and hand them the iPad and tell them to read it instead. Hmmm, maybe that's not a bad idea...
None of this is a surprise, mind you. The West Midlands Police has a ‘hands-off-Muslims policy’. And not just when it comes to rioting. It also is largely the case when it comes to Muslim drug pushing, gang violence, and, last but not least, the propagation of militant Islam in the mosques. In Keighley, near Bradford, their hands-off-Muslims policy has reached ridiculous levels. Scores of ‘unemployed’ Muslim youths parade around the town in their fast and flash cars, untouched by the police. Cars bought by drugs money from the Crack/Heroin Jihad against the white infidels of the Keighley council estates. And have you heard about the social services in Birmingham recently? Don’t they too have a hands-off-Muslims policy? That is why they have systematically failed in Birmingham – because ‘respecting cultural sensitivities’ is more important than saving children’s lives. Indeed cliterodectomies, according to feminist research, have been given the go-ahead in many of the UK’s ‘culturally diverse communities’ – or at least the social services have simply looked the other way.
A tell-tale body giving life,
Or else I want to tell them I light a candle and dress in layers of my grandmother’s petticoats, I lie back on a Persian carpet, slowly I let myself sink, down, down to the depths of hell, to endless acres of boredom and self-loathing and despair, mainlining coffee and plugged in to deafening dubstep… only then can I begin to write on precious strips of birch bark, in my own heart’s blood, naturally.
The key element of The Left Hand of Darkness is that the humans of the planet Winter are asexual – or perhaps more correctly hermaphrodites – both male and female. They only enter breeding cycle one a month, where one of the two partners becomes the female equivalent and one the male equivalent – and who plays what role can vary from cycle to cycle. The key is that there are no genders among the people. Le Guin explores what a society without gender roles would be like through and apart from the perspective of the Envoy, who is male and from a gendered society and species. There is no war on Winter, but there is violence, death, murder, etc. The politics can be just a Machiavellian, but they are different, foreign to the Envoy in a very fundamental way.
EHAG art is also available through eBay & Etsy.
Using my empathy, I focused on trying to pick up on the emotions of any lucid person around, hoping I would hone in on Jessica’s emotions. Normally, the waking feelings of others hit me like a gale force wind, without my even trying. In fact, it had always felt like a bit of a curse that I was a walking sponge for other people’s pain.
THOMAS RE, JEFFERSON T, DEMICHELI V, RIVETTI D. Influenza vaccination for healthcare workers who work with the elderly. Cochrane Database Syst Rev 2006; 3: CD005187.
After being treated in the hospital in Kabul, she is now in a shelter in the capital run by Women for Afghan Women (@WAWHumanRights), a nongovernmental organization that supports and provides shelters for abused women in Afghanistan, and she is under the observation of the Ministry of Women’s Affairs.
Better hit the pavement whether running or walkin'.
What I really love about this banner is that it is adorable and looks perfect in her room, and Emmy has the satisfaction of having something she created in there. I think she did a fantastic job, too!
Thought it would be fun to track my body and weight after having baby girl. This was taken on Thursday. Exactly 2 weeks after giving birth. I'm probably sucking it in a little but there you go.
Initial financial backing is offered by Sport Aid Wales with Nicole Cooke just one success story to start on this path.
Starting things off were two openers: Bass Drum of Death, who lived up to their name, and Luyas, who turned out to be a surprisingly fantastic gift from Canada. The youthful northerners were all smiles and high fives, leaping around the stage like sugar-high kids in a bouncy house, having tapped right in to the crowd’s electric buzz of anticipation for the headlining New York trio.
Brava, me. There's probably other stuff, too, but how am I supposed to know what I do all day? It's not like I pay attention or anything!
A ticking time bomb-Middle East
And there were also those sweet moments where the little one, who’s always quiet throughout the session, would finally say goodbye whenever I was leaving, while one of the sisters could finally pronounce some of the words in that storybook I read with her.
Amnesty International, Canadian branch of the human-rights organization has asked the QUEBEC government to call for a toning down of police measures that, it said, are unduly aggressive and might potentially smother students’ right to free expression. In a news release the group also urged the province to find a peaceful solution to the 11 weeks of sometimes rowdy demonstrations. “Amnesty reaffirms its concern regarding the tuition increases, which would undermine the progression to access to university for all,”
Also amongst the official feature selections at Raindance is the product of a bold attempt by British filmmaker James Fair and his crew to shoot, edit and screen a feature film in 72 hours during the 2010 Melbourne International Film Festival. The Ballad of Des and Mo relates the tale of a happy Irish couple who embark on a second honeymoon in Australia, but are faced with lost luggage, an unforgiving ATM and an Antipodean adventure. Billed as a film about love, luggage and living on the edge, it shows at Raindance on Sunday October 8, the same day as I’ve Got This Idea for a Film, a documentary following Fair and his crew as they embark on their near-impossible mission.
SOLD TO ROHIZAH
I think these are very doable. I'd love to have some company for this challenge. Once a month, on the first, we can all visit each other's blogs, see how it's going, and give some encouragement. There are no rules for this. Just try to scrap your stash, rather than going out and buying stuff. It can be for layouts, cards, tags, you name it. If you have to buy something b/c you love it, no worries. Have a kit of the month? Great. It's just a fun way to encourage each other every month and see what we are all doing with our stash :)
Tucked away in the shadows
Prep before cooking to have kitchen supplies and ingredients ready to use:
In John we read:
How you shape them is up the artistic inner you. There are five basic styles:
I remember pressing a button on a coach once with a sign next to it that said.. don’t press this button unless the red light is on….. yeah right.. I pressed it and promptly set off the fire extinguishers in the engine bay… oops!
Tomorrow I head to Colorado for a much-needed weekend with Mr. Wonderful. This time, we're hanging in his tiny town in the NE corner of the state. I'd tell you where it is, but you wouldn't be able to find it on a map. It's literally one square mile. The whole place, that is. I'm looking forward to seeing with my own eyes this Mayberry-esque place he's describe to me and sent photos of. Plus I'll get to hang with his boys again and get to know them better, which I'm excited about. I'm praying for cooler weather up there than what we've been having. And since the past couple of weeks have felt vaguely like the surface of the Sun here in Austin, I'm willing to bet it will be nicer up there, even if they're just as drought-ridden.
Dock Boggs - Country Blues: Complete Early Recordings - 1997
So while saturated colors pop against the enveloping black background, what is really going on here is a rigid formalist exercise in the alignment of shape and space, a bit reminiscent of the work of Barbara Kasten. Sharp edges arc and slash across the layers of mirror, creating clean geometries and crisp shadows that cross invisible depths. Squared off forms are broken into jagged jutting slivers and fragments. Tiny remnants of tape and paper reflected in the mirrors are subtle evidence of Labatte's painstaking process, while perfect gradients offer unanswered technical questions. This simmering jumble of overlapping colors is actually very carefully controlled chaos.
FLAT-FOOTED BEETLE (above left)
I have a new friend here who has been wonderful. She invited me to join with her and another friend for a weekly lunch date. We've gotten together with our families, we've gone to movies, plays, restaurants. She has gone out of her way to make me feel included. When we settle in our new home she will live a few blocks away. And I am so grateful for her.
So, what small gift would you like from France?
Sounds crazy, right? Well, we'll see. I already have my book ready to roll. The pages are small 4x6, which is part of what's going to make this doable.
A green funky gift bow
The demise of the post room deprives the business of a way for interesting people, and people from different backgrounds, to elbow their way into the business. And that's real shame I think. Even now, I feel that people in the business aren't as diverse as they might have been twenty or thirty years ago. For my taste, there is already too much of a culture of 'the right path' to take to get into the business.
Or you could be the idiot who breaks into the lion enclosure at London Zoo, walking over to the pride with arms open wide and saying “I want to hug the pussy cats.”
My favorite quote (Tests from God, are another great Testimony!)
· Can work with an Agile environment
I doubt I'll shed new light on it for you but some of the responses I've received have caused me to further contemplate.
Not what you would expect. Our adoption agency shut down due to financial difficulties. We do not know where to go from here and what will happen with our file and how much more unexpected expenses we will be asked to come up with. And will there be a baby in the end?
1 lapps
For scuba diving, the ruins of ARC Sebastián de Belalcázar, a sunken ship that survived Pearl Harbor and later became a Colombian Naval ship, offer a good opportunity to discover the diversity and beauty of the Pacific Ocean.
Preheat the oven to 325 degrees. Make the angel food batter. Set aside about 3 cups; pour the rest into an ungreased tube pan.
flea markets
After reading a report of his post in a Chinese tabloid, Ares wrote to the paper explaining that he was ‘provoked’ by a Singaporean uncle at the hawker center who kept ogling at his girlfriend and another female friend.
The problem that is the longest running and has given us the biggest headache is the problem of the other neighbour's barking dog. We seem to have written endless letters and e-mails to the Environmental Health Department of the local council together with the completion of many time sheets detailing when, how often and for how long the dog has been barking. At present the problem is still unresolved. After I posted A night on the tiles I had intended to write a post explaining some more of the background to the problem, but I did not do so, because we had a surprise intervention into the problem, on our behalf. Consequently I felt that it was wiser to keep quiet. The intervention came to nothing and I shall write the intended post shortly.
I can still remember the extra excitement that a visit from 'Daddy' would bring to the live shows. Yet in reality, he was a distinctly unpleasant man. His carefully portrayed image as the 'friend of the children' was far from the truth, and he would always ignore and push past the adoring kids who gathered around him, as though they weren't there... until the occasional months when ITV were in attendance, recording for World of Sport, when of course he magically became their best pal... well until the cameras stopped rolling anyway. He was even worse after the shows... I was always hungry to obtain autographs at the end of the evening, but after several attempts, gave up on the ignorant Daddy as he ritually brushed past me month after month as though I didn't exist.
cleaner of some sort, you are both right and wrong. It is not just a cleaner but a Probiotic cleaner. Think
Kelly Parker Creative groove…sometimes I work in the gardens for inspiration, sometimes I talk long walks to look at the landscape, and sometimes I just work from intuition with music.
There’s a problem with the comments though. There’s always something to fix every time I change to a new layout. Any wonder why I do it so little.
The Han expanded the empire, with Chang'an (today's Xi'an) as their capital. Trade flourished, and the city became the eastern terminus of the Silk Road, which reached all the way to the borders of the Roman Empire. Taoism flourished and, under the Emperor Wudi, Confucian principles were made the foundation of Chinese society. Chang'an was the center of the Chinese world at a time when only the Rome rivaled it in power, sophistication and glory. Today's dominant Chinese ethnicity, the Han, take their name from this dynasty.
Me: One thing I like to do if I am feeling some, but not overwhelming, anxiety and if I am in a controlled environment is meditate. It is very calming for me, but circumstances don’t always allow it. If I am in the middle of a stressful situation sometimes repeating mantras to myself can be very helpful. I will repeat to myself the conservation of energy law, the Bodhisattva’s aspiration, or sometimes “failure is impossible” which is a famous Susan B Anthony quote. Another thing that helps me to cope is to mentally organize something non-related to whatever is causing me anxiety. for example, I will sometimes write a list of all of my tarantulas, in alphabetical order. Doing this gives me a sense of order and control.
“The administration also says we need to help ‘rebuild the Palestinian economy’ — this at a time when our economy is facing serious challenges and Americans are suffering,” Ros-Lehtinen said.
A babies first birthday party has quite a lot of meaning for everyone involved. For the parents, it’s a huge relief that they survived the first year. For the child, they really don’t understand what’s going on except they got to get really messy and eat something that tastes really sweet and nummy. For the grandparents, their life has come full circle with a grandchild(ren) and watching them grow is just pure joy and bliss!
BREAKING: ADDITIONAL STORY-
Fog hugged the ground.
A: When the whole world’s calling you a mindless robot, you kind of get the urge to start talking! Even though "Sophia" in the book is much more impressive than Sophia in real life. I think I’m sullying my impeccable image one post at a time, but so be it.
As Inge bent to lift him up, she looked again at their town hall, which she had lived beside since she was born and no longer even saw. It had been built on a man-made island, belonging to neither side of the river. It stood alone in the centre of the small, bustling city - proud, tall and self-sufficient.
From Rothko to Rauschenberg, the set design focuses on the world of modern art, which moves and divides the characters within the play as they define their identities. “The set is a piece of modern art in the style of Rauschenberg,” Perry explains. “There are many things on the set that are art sculptures. Things like tables and chairs and couches and shelves will exist, but they will not be the thing itself – they will all be created from found objects.”
- Douglass
We got to OMA and Jeff dropped us off at the check in desk with the luggage and then parked the car. Matilda had fallen asleep on the trip, for probably only 45 minutes. So she is at just about four hours of sleep before the flight was going to take off, so you can imagine the terror I was feeling.
The whereabouts of these abandoned holes, as far as I can tell however, remains a mystery.
Garbage (Tricky remix) Milk UK
First, everyone there was awesome. This was the first show that the U.S. has attended and the U.S. consisted of...me. This show has been going on every year since 1977. Show officials and competitors were both really, really excited that I was there. People wanted to take pictures with me and just come up and say thank you for coming. They thought for sure I had to be stationed in the U.K. so when they found out I flew all the way from New Mexico they were EXTRA happy.
and I mean NEVER
Apparently this is what students at Hamline University School of Law consider “critical” reading in legal studies.
It was just... incredibly awesome. As expected. Though we had some quarrels some times.. we managed everything and came back home safely. ^^
This year we have two camps available for those who have completed grades 3-5; two camps available for those who have completed grades 6-8; and one week for those who have completed grades 9-12!!! It’s a full Summer at Camp John Speer and Camp Chilhowee. Get pumped!
Week 1 & 2 – week ending 11th Nov – Getting more into Drupal: Learning drupal and all required functionalities.
Pours inky black with a smallish dark tan head that fades pretty quickly. Admittedly, I wanted to try this one as soon as possible so I quick-chilled it by sticking it in the ice maker, so I bet the head would normally be bigger.
Yup, shower curtains will work too! Those tails are way too long!
basil
And the 30 days straight thing…..forget about it!!!
I’m really not an analytical person – a bit surprising for a former lab technician I admit. I guess that’s why I’m not in a lab anymore. When I write I just tell that person’s story as it comes to me. Now, after brainstorming at our yearly RWAC retreat last weekend, I want to see my characters from a different angle.
The new mopane leaves are like festive bunting filling the forest. Flags of orange and green shine and glow all around us proclaiming Summer Is Here. At the dam the other night there was a massive frog party. When you pull in to listen the frogs go quiet for a while. Then the songs begin again, and the noise levels reach a crecendo that fills your whole head. If you listen you can pick out the different songs, but the bull frogs havent even started yet so the deep base notes are missing.
and Sugar Free Chocolate Pudding - 1 cup. Picture #4: 5 to 6 Broccoli
In His answer, our Lord gives the following main points. First of all, beware of deception, of following false Christs. Then there will be various signs, such as wars, famines, earthquakes – and all these are not the end but rather the beginning of the tribulation. Then there will be the moral signs: the persecutions of Christians; the increase of evil; the growing coldness of love, which is one of the main signs that Christianity is dying, because the sign of a Christian, as our Lord told us, is that he has love for others. Then another sign is that the Gospel is to be preached to the whole world, after which the end will come. Another sign is that there will be a terrible tribulation, i.e. apart even from all the things He has mentioned already: wars, famines, earthquakes. And “the abomination of desolation will be in the holy place” (we must understand this according to the interpretation handed down by the Holy Fathers, which I will speak about); and “the days will be shortened… for the sake of the elect” (Matt. 24:15, 22).
Through Latin, Swing and Ballroom,
boom. i'm such a good influence.
Then he laughed because I hadn’t packed my bag and said “I told you so”
Parenthood
New GM Reggie McKenzie’s first pick is a brute. Tony Bergstrom is a 6’6”, 315 lbs. three-year starter at right tackle for the Utes. A First-team all-Pac-12 selection, Bergstrom is already well-versed in the zone blocking system. He’s a tough, lengthy player who could start effectively in a year or two. He’ll likely push Cooper Carlisle for the left guard spot this year, but is probably best served as a depth option for the 2012-13 season. As a Ute, Bergstrom completed his blocks at an 85% success rate, which was the highest on the team.
Merchant
Abandoned by Swedish poets,
Should I sign this contract, though, I’m going to have to make some decisions about anonymity. I already know I want to publish under a different name. This is to protect my family and other people’s identities rather than my own, though, and I’m willing, nay keen, to associate myself with that name. I’d like to take part in publicity and have a voice rather than send my words anonymously into the world. And that will hopefully help sell the book. In order to make an ebook a success, I understand it’s important to have a web presence, to get people blogging and tweeting about you – all the stuff I’m slowly learning about here…
Adam sang the Foo Fighters classic with guitar, after struggling to find confidence, and noted this was his key issue. Will acknowledged his effects and lighting behind to set the tone for the Rock anthem, though Adam grew in confidence, his lacking style was apparent.
Lorillard are estimated to be worth around 12.5 Billion Dollars. And have bought the company Blu for 135 million dollars. Which isnt’ a drop in the ocean in comparison.
As soon as half-term arrived, so did a nasty cold/flu virus.
Homemade Pasta Dough
For MJ, it has always been about multimedia. She has the most amazing collection of music on her iPod, encompassing a huge range of styles, periods, and countries. She writes beautifully and has two fantasy novels under her belt. She uses movies and television as a powerful learning tool (in the process teaching me that TV is not the evil I once thought it was). And she has an eye for image and design that has led her to become a truly wonderful photographer.
Houston: -5.9%
Alice in Blunderland by John Kendrick Bangs (Humor/Political Satire): The Mad Hatter takes Alice for a visit in the perfect city he's founded... a place where everyone is perfect, because the laws are made to make politicians look good, to keep the rich prosperous, and the powerful powerful. (Sound like anywhere you know?)
The predetermined, inevitable course of events.
Stamps: Morning Glory, Garden Sentiments (SNS Digi)
This is the best time for me to go since I'll be out of the country in a week and after that it's packing for college, so I'm headed north!
Bradley had named Kerrigan, one of those most vocally resistant to his proposed policies, as a member of the Willingham committee.
02. Another System
By bringing together separate realities he created new ones which revealed the truth.
Riteish Deshmukh and Genelia D’Souza, who tied the knot early this month, are busy promoting their latest film “Tere Naal Love Ho Gaya” and they are not complaining as it allows them to spend a lot of time together.
I now live and work in Edinburgh and I love it. It’s always felt like home and it’s a brilliant place for artists.
I left with the certainty that God is amazing. He redeems what is lost and fallen. Motherhood extends beyond biology (or genetics). Motherhood is a God given privilege. Motherhood is a spiritual and emotional bond.
I hope that you are all having a good week, and I will be back again soon...I promise. : )
I remember loathing Childa everyday she was with that idiot boy. I had followed them around on several occasions and had wanted to make my presence known to them but, somehow, I couldn’t bring myself to do it because, no matter how terrible it was, my own self-righteousness could have come back to bite my ass.
On the way up after my second run down Claire’s I saw Fireman John and Johnny Eyebrows watching the ski patrol practice. Now I think Katie on a tobagon is as cute as anything, but i watched her from the lift and they were just wasting time in my humble opinion.
Perhaps some of these refer to song lyrics? I wouldn’t know. I don’t listen to much music except the song of silence.
My goodness, baby girls are sweet, aren't they?!
I highly encourage anyone interested in having one made for themselves to contact Arunas. He is a wonderful person who loves to share his passion for photography with others. Quite less than $100 can get you a one-of-a-kind pinhole beauty which makes a great gift to you or someone you know. I get nothing from this; just want everyone to share in the joy! Take a look at some of the cameras he's made so far, and then shoot him an email at akulis2 [at] gmail [dot] com to have your own made...... Oh, and tell him Susan Mac sent you!
So the Chronic aspect of this can have a serious, accumulated effect on your mental health.
How did Jesus treat Thomas? He didn’t say to Thomas,” Good to have you on side as one of my followers. Sorry that you can’t really believe that I am risen from the dead, but just tag along with the others anyway.” No! His word was uncompromising. “Don’t continue in unbelief, but be believing. You have been confronted with the evidence, now act on it.” God never says in the scriptures, “Please try to believe in me if you can. But if you can’t, I’ll respect your sincerity.”
The above pictures show it… watch out if you’re in Oklahoma, Kansas, Missouri, Iowa, Illinois, Wisconsin, Michigan, Indiana, Ohio . Damaging winds, large hail, and possible tornadoes are coming this way , or already over the area.
I take a deep breath, and pick up the phone. I put my hand on the right key to speed-dial her... then change my mind. I put the phone down, pick up the blade carefully - wouldn't want to cut my fingers, too many awkward questions people could ask - and lift it to my shoulder.
The Unquiet by Jeannine Garsee (NetGalley)
I guess it is a horse a piece either way.
For the sake of documentation, here are screenshots of my research site and this blog a few days ago. My research site now differs slightly as I made a bit of a mess of the upgrade and I haven’t completely fixed the customisation again.
Craig T. Nelson and JoBeth Williams were cast because Steven Speilberg wanted “unknowns” featured as the parents in the film so that the monsters and ghosts would take center stage.
Black pepper powder – 1/4 teaspoon
Here's a zoom to show the range of holos. Octa Gone Wild is long gone in relation to buying it from the usual outlets, but if you can keep an eye on eBay or blog sales (where I got mine!) you might get lucky.
The Thames was lined with old ships, no rigging, no sails, "rotting at anchor" (Hughes, The Fatal Shore, 42). But the Hulks Act (1776) stated prisoners could be kept on these old ships, 'reclaimed' through 'Hard Labour' and assigned out daily in work gangs (Hughes 42-43), before being shipped to New South Wales or Van Diemen's Land to serve out their sentence. But shameful overcrowding led to riots on the hulks, protests from neighboring towns, and what propelled change -- the threat of prisoners escaping, carrying with them gaol fever.
Over the last five months, @WalmartLabs has been building its India operations with a focus on social and digital technology. It has hired 20 developers of the initial targeted 100.
Happy Easter all! Want to apologize for the days that Photomontagery was blank! My computer was a little moody and would not let me upload any photos….gotta love technology, when it works. Just some captures with no rhyme or reason, ones of life! Thank you for viewing and peace and love to everyone!
(polarisrising.com)
But I just want to say, to all the darts players out there - both past and present - thank you for years of sporting pleasure, and long may you all continue to entertain us! Maybe we're moving into a new era of darts, when you can see the dartboard without smoke-impeded vision and it's a bottle of water on the table for refreshments rather than vodka, but as long as this sport continues to evolve and bring us exciting games, and even more exciting players, then I will continue to be a lifelong fan. Forever!
Directed by Stefan Novinski
Babyboy is my baby. He will always be my Babyboy. I just don't like all these LASTS. By next year at this time I probably won't need to carry him through the parking lot. His stroller might have strolled its last stroll. All traces of pull-ups and sippy-cups will be extinct.
Here are three of my favorite tools. When I was in graduate school, my mom gave me that lovely Wusthof knife for Christmas. To be completely honest, that knife has been a game changer. I don't think I can say enough about how great a good knife really is for cooking. Next is a good cast iron skillet. Before I moved into my new house, I bought my own skillet, thinking I'd give it a try. Now that it's well seasoned and has been used quite a bit, I don't know what I'd do without it! Finally, is the newest member of my kitchen family, my new Le Crueset, enameled cast iron pot. It's just settling in with the rest of my kitchen favorites, but from what I've already prepared in it, I can see that it's going to be indispensable.
His past as Bâri′ would never do.
I love honour and respect Myself.
David, my favourite of the many technical support staff we dealt with, told me that we'd have to sign a new twelve month contract if we wanted a replacement for the modem that their technicians (incorrectly, as it turned out) told us was the reason why we hadn't had continuous connection for more than twenty minutes for the past month. I could sign that contract, or I could pay Eircom €47 for a new one or, y'know, "just buy your own in Currys". When I pressed David on why exactly I might have to do that he said (and I quote verbatim here, seriously) "Uuuuuuhhh......deregulation ummmmmmmmmmm increased competition and stuff............................................................................................uhhhhh, yeah..." He then left me on hold with squalling feedback in my ear for ten minutes before realising that oh, I was still under contract, as I had said. Fair balls, David, I'd turn up to work stoned off my fucking face too if I could get away with it.
I need another drink, lots of it. Maybe a night all dressed up and out on the town?
Like one of Saturn’s rings, the band turns out to be one Earth radius thick, or about 4,000 miles (6,437 kilometers).
I've never had a gas fireplace before moving into this home, so it never even crossed my mind to clean it! Hello! And did you know that those logs aren't glued in place? You can move them around and it changes the way the flames look! (Most of you are thinking...uh duh...but I truly didn't know!) LOL!!
From Wikipedia.org
As expected, at one point in the film, conflict arises, and suddenly we see character traits that were mostly minor in the first half of the film become larger. Matt’s ideals turn him into something of a hero, as do Steve’s. Steve also uses his abilities to gain more influence, even helping Andrew become popular in the process. Andrew, however, gives in to his dark side, and watching him do so is both disturbing and completely understandable. The way he is treated by the majority of people in the film, it’s a wonder he doesn’t go off the deep end sooner. In some ways, this film is like the ultimate warning against parental abuse and school-bullying. And it certainly has its roots in reality. School shootings happen for a reason that’s usually related to a bad home life coupled with a harsh school environment. People don’t lash out for the fun of it. Andrew’s pain is the pain of a million high school kids and when given the ultimate power, it’s hardly a surprise when he uses it for ill.
Or was it all said in vein, only to lead me on with just a dream?
Now for the rest of the week.
She is happy, sitting on her own and holding pictures of her forever family.
I hope this girlie little card brought a smile to your face and sincerely hope it didn't offend anyone.....I don't usually post personal attire on my blog, but thought this was a fun & cute little card. Thanks for stopping in and have a great day!!
- zest of one orange
Everything is great!! Allie is amazing and Aiden is as awesome as ever!
recess light on mantle
Nod to him, elves, and do him courtesies.
Down to the borders we go
Agents now are only allowed to sit about 10 metres away from where polling takes place. Wong argued that this distance made it close to impossible to identify if the voter was a valid one.
Overall it was fun for Makenzie and me, not so much for Nick, and Tanner was indifferent.
Depp’s Shakespeare-like vernacular actually provides a ton of laughs, without confusing the audience, like so many of Shakespeare’s writings. Moretz has been growing before our eyes, her performance, as Carolyn was so snide and snarky, I loved it, I just wish we had more of her. I’m so convinced she’s going to be a major star one day.
Davey places him on my chest. He cried the moment he was out. Such a beautiful sound! I hold and kiss him. I rub his back, and stare at him. He calms down when he hears my voice. He was covered in thick vernix. A nurse sucks his mouth and nose. Once the cord stopped pulsing (which was very quick actually) Davey cut the cord.
lesbian, transgendered life
Several factors may influence the discrepancy, researchers say, including snowmelt, interaction with groundwater, flow and discharge rates, solar radiation, wind and humidity. But even after factoring out those elements, the scientists were surprised by the cooler-than-expected maximum, mean and minimum temperatures of the streams.
My colleague in the hospital was very concerned that she had to see people on the wards suffering from MRSA, but actually all the precautions, such as disposable aprons and intense hand washing, were to protect the patient rather than me. I had to do the handwashing in a sink where unless I took great care the water sprayed over my clothes: ready to drip off, or be breathed in by the hapless patient. A nurse told me that properly drying my hands was most important, as the tiniest droplets can just shake off. My own healthy immune system is quite capable of dealing with these bugs, until it is not. With Superstaph, the patient’s wasn’t.
game tying single to left and drives in his first two rbi’s of his career. The 45′s
Sunday’s Budweiser commercial about the end of Prohibition reminded me of my dad’s stories about the day legal beer arrived in his neighborhood. This is especially pertinent since he grew up in Budweiser’s hometown of St. Louis, at 5622 Roosevelt Place, a neighborhood called Wells-Goodfellow today. Dad was 13 when Prohibition ended in December, 1933.
And of course in January you will have the satisfaction of seeing your style advice in print in the form of the outfit I will wear.
There’s a historical irony to all this. In the 80′s and 90′s, when Microsoft dominated the software industry, Silicon Valley (led by the VC firm Kleiner Perkins) fostered a network of allied companies it called a keiretsu, a term loosely based on the Japanese practice of companies interconnected by both strategy and cross-shareholdings. One company that emerged from Kleiner’s so-called keiretsu was Google, which did more than any company to weaken Microsoft’s grip on the web.
Before I evaluate the merits of the different options, I do want to discuss a point that has come up in some of my previous discussions regarding the Federal Reserve and central banking. Namely, that the Federal Reserve has an enormous power in its role as a “lender of last resort” that we have for some inexplicable reason decided can only be used to assist the financial sector and not the public sector, or even the public at large. The relevance here is that, while with a revenue stream of about $50 billion a year you can create an effective Job Insurance system, if the Job Insurance system is allowed to use its revenues as collateral for a loan from the Federal Reserve, the potential for public action on a grand scale becomes immense.
And in truth, on a showery day in October there wasn't a great deal on show. Put perhaps like fishing, when you don't have to make a catch to have a great day, we thoroughly enjoyed our discovery. There were dragonflies of course, darters and the odd hawker - and we could hear many birds, the trees were gnarled and covered in lichen, some huge fungi, plenty of grasses and ferns. There were wildflowers too and though these aren't my strong point there would be much to see in summer, a highlight is evidently Marsh Cinquefoil.
So many new conveniences that make our lives easier, or do they? I can remember it taking all day for mom to make a big pot of soup and her tending to it ..made the house smell so wonderful. Now the crock-pot does that in no time and it tastes similar but not really the same. Did your family ever use Green Stamps? We got them at the local A&P store for groceries we bought. I knew we had to go out of town just to redeem them. Mom bought an iron and many other items we needed at home. I can still taste that nasty glue they had on them. Mom made us kids do the licking of the stamps.
Speed Ascend Claiming agenda bold Complete 1-1 Cranky’s Teachin’s
they replaced us, now we got to learn from pain
Helmut Newton
So I took an entire week off from blogging - without meaning to. Matt had shoulder surgery and I was/am exhausted. I got quite a few naps in this weekend, but am still dragging. Brent has been a total pain in the rear - I think it's because Dad is in a sling and hasn't been able to play + I really think Brent is worried about him and doesn't understand.
CD re-release of limited edition LP originally released in 1994.
David Millar - TT specialist – DM is one of the elder statesmen of the peloton, outspoken against doping after his own conviction, he is often the go to guy for media interviews. Expect to see him doing massive turns on the front between 2-3km out, as he forms a key part of the lead out for Tyler Farrar the team’s sprinter.
We are both laughing. She is proud of her subterfuge, peacocking a little. Eventually, she persuaded Peter Mensch to come (along with a reluctant Sharon Osbourne, who referred to her as a “persistent bitch”.) She had magicked that arrogant man out of the documentary onto her doorstep through sheer teenage chutzpah. It took her another 20 years to marry him, however. In the meantime, she dedicated her first novel to him, and he helped her get a job at EMI, but both of them committed to other relationships. He had three children with his wife Melissa, while Louise married an American property developer called Anthony LoCicero and they had three children together, the youngest of whom is now four.
Recommended for those who love ensemble casts of quirky and lovable characters and procedural style shows with supernatural touches.
Where: Allyn's Cafe
Federation of Cuban Women ; Pratec, Peru;
The first Austin-based Capitol building was located at what is now the northeast corner of 8th and Colorado. It was a one-story structure, with a broad hall running east to west down the center, with the Senate Chamber on the north side of the hall and the House of Representatives Chamber on the south, and committee rooms in back to the west.
On May 6th, we made a visit to the Children’s Creativity Museum, a hands on multimedia arts and technology centre in San Francisco. Established in 1998, its mission is to nurture creativity, collaboration and communication to inspire new ideas and innovative solutions.
Thank you again for joining us for the Lollipop Press Blog Hop, Day 4. Your next stop on the hop is Angie. You will like her, she is sweet, talented, and funny! See ya around!
It completely drew me in and when I first saw it my first thought was I NEED to read that book. I love how you have the symbol on fire and that's what really catches your eye to start with and I really love the picture of the buildings and the city at the bottom as it really shows you that it's going to be a dystopian book.
The people exclaim that Jesus must be “the Prophet who is come into the world.” This is an allusion to the words of Moses:
Funny? Ironic? Sad? Joyous? I am not really sure. I find myself for a third time in a span of months in the same city where I last saw you, after not having been here for years prior.
Miri and Sibu are expected to see better turnouts than Kuching.
Szatmari, P., Bartolucci, G., Bremner, R., Bond, S., & Rich, S. (1989). A follow-up of high-functioning autistic children. Journal of Autism and Developmental Disorders, 19, 213-225.
Like I said... I am an emotional mess. So over the moon happy this baby is coming and is ours forever to absolute hysterics because all I really want is Makenzie. I am then hysterical apologizing to this baby for not showing them the love the deserve and that I really do want them and that I just miss their sister. This past week the emotions of this child being from a sperm donor has been extremely emotional. I think I have mentioned this before but Ryan has always been so confident and positive about this. Knowing this child is HIS. No ifs ands or buts. He has been so good about it and honestly going through all the IUI's and getting pregnant so was I. I have felt so good about it all. Knowing this was the right choice. Over the past week its not that I regret our choices because I absolutely don't. This child was so meant to come to us this way and this was the only way we could get them to us healthy. but the feelings of how will we tell them and when will we tell them? The thoughts of how will we do this again? The fear that maybe at some point Ryan will have some concerns or worries. Its been weird talking about what this baby might look like. I keep catching myself from saying things like-- Oh I pray he has your nose or butt or hair color... Whatever it might be. I fully believe this child will be a mini replica of Ryan (if its a boy). I can only imagine Ryan's little partner. There is no doubt about that. But the fear in the back of my mind is oozing out with my added pregnancy hormones. It gets exhausting and overwhelming. I would love to hear from anyone of you that might have used a sperm or even an egg donor. Did you ever have similar fears or concerns. How have you decided and when to tell your child? I don't want it to be a big deal because its not. Its very simple. Its very matter of fact. There is no other Daddy somewhere- Ryan will be the name on that birth certificate. I just don't want it to be something that later down the road when it does come out that they feel I was hiding something from them. I have been very open about it with friends and family and its now all over the internet. Never have I thought it would be a secret. I know I have a lot of time to think about this but its on my mind now. So if y'all have advice. I would so much appreciate it!
I use acrylic paints, scrapbook papers, stamps and found ephemera. I doodled and added my own art or found objects.
I had two songs that I definitely wanted to use - "Ants Marching" and "Everyday." "Ants Marching" was the first song I ever heard by Dave. I was at the H.O.R.D.E. tour and I heard this weird riff coming from the small stage. I went to check it out. This band featured black and white guys, guitar, violin and sax. I thought, "man, this is great, but they'll never get big, they're too different." Oops! I think of that every time I heard the riff. "Everyday" is a rare instance of a video really enhancing the song. If you've never seen it, check it out. I "crowdsourced" the third song on my personal Facebook page, and if you want to hear what song it is, well, you gotta tune in. If you have a subscription, great! I'm on The Catholic Channel at 7:20 pm-ish. If not, go here to get a free online trial subscription.
Ahem. Yeah. Well, score 1 for mother's intuition.
So, my advice is to set goals, whether they be daily, weekly, or month. Whatever it takes to get your butt in the chair.
If you are still on the fence after taking the oath, do not get a wristband. You must be committed 100%. There are no refunds or transfers.
TUESDAY July 24th from 5-9pm and THURSDAY July 26th from 5-9pm. Work being mailed must arrive by end of day Thursday, July 26th. (If mailing work you must include sufficient return postage for unsold art)
The version posted here was compiled from the multitude of releases Bob farmed these tracks out to over the years. I have no idea if the *recordings* are what were to be used on the withdrawn LP, though I'm nearly certain they are. I've taken the liberty to add on two tracks to the end, which may have been recorded at the same time, but not on the final track list. Why? Because I can...
Just by writing
Cynthia and Greg Leitich Smith will appear at A Festival of Authors, in celebration of 100 Years of School Libraries in Austin, which will take place from 2 p.m. to 6 p.m. May 12 at Reagan High School in Northeast Austin.
I thank thee, for giving me
What I liked about this beer was the golden color and the crisp taste, it did not have any harsh bitter aftertastes or the overuse of citrus and zest. I'm putting this one in the list of great beers I'm glad I was able to try since living in New York meant being able to try almost everything. If I see other varieties of Kona brews, it's very likely I'll pick them up based on this good experience.
Well, we thought today was going to be a rainy day but the sun managed to sneak out. I love to see the sun here in Juneau. When the sun shines it makes you want to get out of the house even if it's to run errands.
Smudge proof, multi-purpose pencils in 20 show-stopping colours.
Profits are good. Very very good, people who make profits hunting around for places to put the profits. How about lending, lending, lending. Good returns. Ah returns and returns and returns...hmmm
Clouzot fills the frame with moody imagery. There is the titular raven, of course, but the film also has a predominance of darkness in the lengthening shadows and the many characters who wear black dress. The contrast between light and dark/good and evil typically reflecting this post-Expressionist pre-film noir symbolism is best exemplified by the verbal face off between the sarcastic and seemingly omnipresent psychiatrist Vorzet and the frustrated and angry Germain while a lamp swings on a pendulum between ‘em. Clouzot’s influence in moments like this was obviously great. Not only did Hitchcock admire him, but the great Orson Welles used similar tactics in Touch of Evil, a full 15 years later.
But can you guess
before the wedding. Safer that way.
Ken, the rent is now 12 days past due, as per the rental agreement, I will be adding a $25 late fee, which is now due! You cannot deduct anything from the rent without approval from me. You called me late friday evening and I had a licensed contractor out to repair the toilet first thing the next morning. You are not authorized to make ANY repairs to the apartment without my permission. The contractor also stated that the only way the toilet could have broke is if something very heavy fell against it, so I could charge you for the new toilet and repairs!
He darted to the meat and gobbled it down frantically. I laughed again when he started licking the edges of the box, following it around as it skittered across the floor, his tongue searching out every nook and cranny that gravy might be hiding. Eventually I picked the box up and rinsed it to fill with water, although it was sparkling clean already thanks to the mutt’s efforts.
I dropped him at his lesson. And then Mr5 sat quietly in the car while I rang the person to whom that email had gone. So that I could apologise in person, and explain how I never do that, and ... grovel really. She laughed. She told me that I was lucky that it had gone to someone who was not going to worry about it. I agreed that I was lucky. She explained her position, addressing my smart-arse remark. I agree that she was right. Because she was right, and I was just being a smart-arse to the friend to whom I had been intending to send that email.
Last week, in the unlikely setting of leafy Mancunian suburbia, I had a stick of dynamite inserted in my asshole, courtesy of Rhode Island pseudo-hillbillies Deer Tick."
Well it is officially the month of May, folks! In a few more weeks we will be seeing cars racing around the Indianapolis Motor Speedway. Unfortunately some unsettling news regarding the 500 has been announced today:
http://www.moonfiredesignsblog.com/ Rachel does some great tutorials & explains well her crafty creations! A lover of the Alterable, she does so well! Theres lessons for us all here!
So, here’s my plan for the upcoming weekends:
Accessories: Wax Paper, Iron, Paper Towel, Spellbinders Square Nestabilities, Craft knife, Paper Piercer and Template, Dew Drops, foam tape, sponge daubers, scratch paper, May Arts Twill Ribbon;
He says,“It is a very small injury but certainly Cesc will be out for Sunday. “He is disappointed. We all feel sorry and sad for him. The only way we help him now is to win the Carling Cup as he contributed a lot in this competition.”
…until he started dry humping me.
It is so broad it covers the whole sky.
This simple Shrimp with Anise Sauce is a traditional Colombian dish from the Department of Sucre, where plain white rice is always served to soak up the aromatic anise sauce.
Let cool and then cut into bars. We've found that cutting them in thirds the long way and then into the desired width makes for a good sized bar. We wrap ours individually to make it easier to grab and go.
3) Age
As other news dominates the media, no doubt to the joy of the Cabinet’s public relations department, we need to talk again about these are.
Mother’s health should he considered. In family life, men must and should be considerate of their wives, not only in the bearing of children, but in caring for them through childhood. The mother’s health must be conserved, and the husband’s consideration for his wife is his first duty, and self-control a dominant factor in all their relationships.
2 whispered
Don't forget there is a new challenge happening on the CopicOz Blog in a few hours and there is a prize of a pack of X-press It Blending Card and a 24 Copic Wallet just waiting for one lucky participant!! Hope to see you playing along!!!
Luckily we came away mostly unscathed. My daughter is tick-free. Being such, it’s time to go prepare the lovely rotisserie chicken that The Mister was kind enough to pick up from the grocery store for me.
I noticed in Julie's layouts that she used some mixed media on them, and given that I have started to do the same I thought it would be interesting to add some moulding paste , gesso, gauge and paint all at once. Why not right ? LOL!
What are your thoughts? Agree or disagree? Think I'm talking nonsense? Let me know.
We lived where we wanted to live. And when we’d explored the galaxy, we decided to build more of us. And spread beyond our galaxy. To the dwarf galaxies that orbit it. To the minor galaxies, the humans once called the Large and Small Magellanic Clouds. We knew it would take hundreds of thousands of years. It takes time to travel between the stars. Between the galaxies. But we did not care. We had time. We had nothing but time. Each of us can live for centuries. For as long as we repair ourselves. We never have to die.
This chicken has a nice pesto sauce. I put a big bunch of parsley in the food processor with the zest and juice of 1 lemon. Then I added 1/2 cup Parmesan, and some salt, pepper, and red pepper flake. I ran olive oil into the machine while it was running until it reached a good consistency.
Here's how I preserve my lemons...
Pottery - my husband and I once fell in love with a house of a relative, which was filled with unique, handmade pottery items. It created a magical atmosphere.
*go to shoprite
It comes from
Thirdly, because the die roll is a strong connector with the physical action. Again, this is habit, from playing lots of rpgs, but we have learnt from them that doing things and rolling dice are the same thing. So what slows us down and makes us go “Hmm, my character examines the object in a thoughtful way” is the sense of squib which arises from physically picking up a die and throwing it, and the random sense of outcome also provides squib to not knowing if the scene will reveal something to our character. Without that, we had no reason to posit our characters doing something because physically, our players weren’t doing anything.
Place bulgur in a bowl and cover with plenty of water. Set aside.
While cleaning out some art boxes in the garage I found some old sketchbooks.
BLOEMFONTEIN: Security guard shot by four armed attackers.
Now, I like this plumber I called. I would like to gift him with business from a home that he would not mind returning to if necessary. Hence, respect for his bowels, particularly when the proper receptacle for an unhappily queasy stomach's contents would be out of order is certainly central to my self-respect.
Other then that .....not much else. So we shall see what happens with that. For now gonna go read bible and book and try and listen to music and pray then go to sleep sicne i work go hang out with kay and do a photo shoot and hopefully come home and do school. I am too much of a goody goody to go ALL fall break without any school. and hopefully shall get to clean soon too because my car and room are a mess and maybe help do dishes and vacuum. and maybe read for fun actually... but we'll see. At least i have a lot of options but not to get ready for bed since gotta work at 7 in the morning tomorrow.
Lenhart’s doctor confirmed in an affidavit that he wrote the prescription for her and that he never received a call from CVS asking to confirm the prescription. Benton thinks the pharmacy may have called the wrong physician.
Introducing the Devon! In Girl's World Vibe Carrie no doubt. Loving this tangerine color. Leave me some when you go stock up. It's hoard worthy. Just sayin'.
four roses bourbon, fee brothers cherry bitters, cara cara peel
Now comes the hard part. The worst part about farming. The time has come where I have to decide which doe I'm going to keep and which I'm going to sell. On a serious dairy farm, I would keep all the does and sell the bucks. (The two bucklings are being sent to Jennifer as barter for Annie.) But as this is my little hobby farm, I have to be realistic about what I can afford/ have room to keep. I really don't want to double my herd every spring. I also have to be honest with myself about how much I can personally keep up with along with all my other duties. With Husband being gone so much, I have to be able to handle everything alone. Having a few goats get loose isn't a big deal for me. But having so many goats that they're overcrowded and go wandering looking for something to eat isn't something I can deal with on my own and frankly isn't good dairying either.
The memories that started surfacing a short while back are older memories. I remember entire “scenes”. From start to finish. How I would enter his room, wearing what I was told to wear. In my memories I am wearing summer dresses. He will remove my underwear, tell me to lie on the bed, and without further ado, just tear inside me (quite literally), or he will make me kneel and suck him off. All the while he calls me derogatory names, telling me how much I like this, mixed with compliments on how good I am, how talented I am, but that this only proves that I must like it.
6 Green Onions
Cake? Cupcakes? - Nope. Again, against school policy. Parents aren't allowed to bring or send in cupcakes or cake for birthdays or special treats, so we teachers have to abide by the same rule.
I´m sorry about the melting permafrost. I really didn´t intend for it to happen so fast.
Nothing, that's all that Bobby left me, yeah,
Other combinations have been Retribution + Skorne, Cryx (pAshpy) + Retribution, and Khador (Strakhov) with Cryx (Terminus I think). All battles were incredibly fun and with my Troll partner we decided to go straight to ass kicking. That we did, but Circle + Legion could sneak a caster kill victory from us in the middle of our face smashing. We’ll be better prepared next weekend.
After the movie they showed me this thing that I wrote when I was about nine or so, at my dads office. It was all about being against capitalism and giving power to the people. I probably had no idea what I was writing about and why.. But damn was I a smart kid. Then they lent me some of their old cd's. yayy
However, my heart cheers, despite the terror as we gun it down the hill, over the river, up the opposite side. And, if we hadn’t let ourselves go, we would have never discovered the beauty of a winter river, a hidden jewel buried deep in the forest. Nor the exhilaration of facing the challenge together.
it's all lost.. gone
It was a desperate time for us all, and you know what they say about desperate times? Oh for crying out loud, get your mind out of that gutter this instant! No, desperate times called for desperate measures, and none more desperate than my actions that day. Most of the men focussed on the ground troops or tried to strike down the walkers with heavy artillery or missiles. Men who had never taken the time to read up on the enemy enough to know that you can rarely take out one of those buggers with anything short of a god-damned nuke! But it wasn’t a nuke I used that day, no siree.
Dating Advice for Guys. Hey guys, what’s up? I’m Jet, and I’m Star and we’re the Wing Girls. And today, we’re gonna tell you how to be romantic. Okay, so about romance, you’re probably thinking romance moments. Like, I do what I need to do and that’s it. Yuck. Bad news flash, girls love romance.
Now first of all I will go through the entire situation as of what all happened as what he explained to me in an email for this article.
I scanned my shelves and found two then turned to amazon. The title got my attention (family name) but the tag line grabbed me. I went the whole year without reading any of the books on my list, failing the reading challenge.
2. RAW episodes of various dramas from several countries are available to watch. This is a good alternative to Dramacrazy, EpDrama, KrDrama.org, etc. However, no subtitle/closed captioning is provided.
9.Salt : as taste
We must remember our duty to Nature before it is too late. That duty is constant. It is never completed. It lives on as we breathe. It endures as we eat and sleep, work and rest, as we are born and as we pass away. The duty to Nature will remain long after our own endeavours have brought peace to the Middle East. It will weigh on our shoulders for as long as we wish to dwell on a living and thriving planet, and hand it on to our children and theirs.
Roll the pizza dough out and fit onto two 15-inch pizza pans. Drizzle 1 tbsp of olive oil and 1 tsp of garlic on each pizza crust, followed by 1/2 cup each of the mozzarella cheese and 1/2 cup of the Cheddar cheese. Scatter half of the bell pepper, sliced onion, chicken and bacon on top of the cheeses. Sprinkle another 1/2 cup mozzarella cheese and 1/2 cup Cheddar cheese over each pizza and drizzle each pizza with 1 tbsp more of olive oil. Bake the pizzas for 20 to 25 minutes, or until the crusts are lightly browned.. Slice each pizza into 8 pieces.
“This way.”
"[d]eterminations regarding whether a disclosure requires undue experimentation should give recognition to the competitive significance of the time required for experimentation; when product life-cycles are short, greater disclosures may be needed in order to be competitively meaningful."As before, the FTC is urging that the USPTO to employ more "Rule 105" Requirements for Information (see MPEP 704.10), which allows the PTO to require the submission of information “reasonably necessary to properly examine or treat the matter” and also require information “reasonably calculated to lead to such relevant information."
Please pray for GSG and her entire family right now sweet friends. I know it would mean the world to her.
My goal weight right now is 190, and I know that by the these things will swallow me, so I’ve decided that when I reach my goal, I’m going to burn them. It will be a final goodbye. However, until then, I will wear them. Even when I’m 192 and I can use them as a blanket, I will have those babies strapped on with a belt. The night before the sending off I’ll wear them one last time. I might even cry a little.
O. Overnight hospital stays: Yes, a couple times. The most recent was when I was 19 and had surgery.
It is with a giddier impatience than ever that I look forward to November, for the grand unveiling of the stratospherically exciting Lanvin collection for H & M. Here’s hoping for drama and theatrics, velvet and luxe satins, exquisite, deep-throated jewel tones and gorgeous embellishment courtesy of the great Alber Elbaz. Just keep it as far removed as possible from the current Uniqlo collection, and I’ll be over the moon…
It's quite the adventure. No other way to live!
she said she would like to retract her previous statement...
"Guess what I found on Craigslist?"
* Spellbinders Nestabilities: Labels Four
Remember the nursery rhyme “Oh be careful little eyes what you see”? We as people are blinded by reality, I believe we attempt to be moral agents who love each other despite all of our differences.
As you'd guess, I'm now working on my Düsseldorf images. I'll give you one bite for now, because we had the unexpected surprise of watching a Dutch glass blower making tree ornaments at one of the stands:
I wonder how Ai No Kusabi would have ended if Iason Mink simply said, “No, thanks.” and left? Anyways, Riki seems to be under the impression that he is in total control and running this moment in time.
I can meet a new contact and take a photo of they business card on my phone, then said contacts email, phone number, website etc etc are synced with my Macbook, iPad and iPhone.
One Eye Closed by Karen Whiddon
There was a bit of satisfaction, though, to those sore muscles that would appear a couple of days after a run. Knowing that I had taken control of my muscles and worked them hard. Knowing that there was benefit to having worked those muscles. My body may not have liked it at the time, but it was beneficial to me. Even now, I may not run anymore but there are times where I have worked my muscles to my benefit. Whether it’s swinging an 8 pound digging bar to plant a flower garden or lifting drywall for installation. There is a satisfaction that goes with those sore muscles a couple of days later.
Guilt is a witch. Yes, generally I like to keep things light and tidy around here, but honest-to-southern-dust, there is no other word for her. She is a certifiable, pointy-hat-wearing, broomstick driving, warty-faced stalker. And I oughta know.
When it comes to social media, seniors are especially concerned about privacy, Loomis said. The workshop emphasized ways to use Twitter without giving too much information away, such as reading feeds exclusively and establishing privacy settings.
When I cry it's because:
As I write, it is 10 at night. I stopped in Jerseyville on my way home from work to pick up a few hundred pounds of ingredients we use to grind chicken feed. As soon as I got home I unloaded the van and we all piled in to head to church. Once home, I closed up the layers, checked on the chicks and poults in the brooder, moved a fence to surround the outdoor brooder (first use this season) and ground 500 pounds of feed. I’m eating supper as I write this. There are dishes to wash, laundry to put away, books I have put off and a blog I have neglected.
They must also develop what they have between their ears and their hearts to look kind.
Which companion did you either want to be or fancy:
And remember my sewing stand turned into a table? I'm so glad that I sold it because as much as I loved it, it was a pain in the you know what to haul around--very heavy and it took up so much room in our vehicle. And the lady who purchased it was so excited. She told me that she had a room in her house completely devoted to local artists, and this is where this table was going.
Sets and Costumes: High-end all the way. Joanne Woodward doesn't look completely at ease in Travilla, though.
but she worked on that window until
So the 1.2 patch has been out now for about a week. Mostly I have no issues. EXCEPT in warzones. The new rules for awarding medals and how they relate to rewards. Well I think it smells. I am not a well equipped player in PvP. In order to get yourself equipped you need to earn warzone commendations. Now before 1.2 this would mean you would grind out warzones. Earn medals and commendations, and get paid for the time in experience and credits.
Cover ham with foil and put in the oven to heat through according to packaging instructions. (I usually estimate 10-15 minutes per lb.)
Step Eight: You can see below I have all kinds of extra zipper tape - no worries. Now you will pin the front & back cover right sides together. I'M GOING TO YELL THIS NEXT PART - UNZIP YOUR ZIPPER ABOUT HALF WAY. Seriously or else you will be throwing this whole thing away, and that will make you very sad.
When, glimmering through the groaning trees,
Strength: Defense is always the name of the game with a Rick Pitino-coached team. The Cardinals press full-court and then settle into a very effective 2-3 zone. The defense has led them to force nearly 16 turnovers per game. They get their opponents playing faster than they want to play and when a mistake is made the Cardinals are there to capitalize. Running and gunning may look fun, but it’s playing right into the Cardinals’ hands.
Well imagine my surprise when apparently Mr. Conte himself not only read what I wrote but took the time to post a response to it. So following is Mr. Conte’s response as posted on this site:
As for plot, its opened to interpretation. If it wasn’t for the product description on the download page, you’ll have no idea what you’re doing. But despite the lack of a direct narrative, it creates one of the greastest mysteries in gaming, since it is never explained how the kid was transported to the world of Limbo.
The initial carnival mood where people were giving flowers to FRU personnel, who reciprocated by wearing them, was hijacked by a section of the crowd.
I just looked up Corelle on Wikipedia and according to that, it came out when I was 4. So I don't think it was THAT new. But it was new to us and apparently the sales boy.
ISBN-13 Book: 9780525478812
even if there is no way to tell
Onaje Allan Gumbs and Kenny Kirkland on keyboards,
At this point the film has said, “Long distance relationships are so difficult that even when you finally do have each other in the end, it is not what you envisioned it would be because what you have wanted is the beginning and you are no longer there, you are at a place that the separation has taken you.”
In this day of 3+ megapixel cellphone and GPS coordinate cameras that mark each image with the time and the location where it was taken and will upload all those photos to “the cloud” (aka the current term for Internet storage… a 30+ year old concept) for immediate private sharing there is absolutely no reason that almost every HOA/CID vendor does not provide complete before/during/after photo documentation of their work on every project. So that CID/HOA boards who aren’t on-site and their management (who are also not on-site daily at many CID/HOAs) can see that contracted tasks are occurring and if not, why not.
The Avengers were exotic and cool. On top of that they were a team – a team that importantly didn’t get on. They were a mixed bag of screw ups and weirdos really and this was quite a break from the DC teams like JLA (no, not JLS) where they all saw eye to eye and it was all for the common good. There was a delicious thrill around the Hulk and Iron Man on the same team – how would it work?
I’m not sure I would have been motivated on that one without my buddy and route crafter MC.
I have no idea what the weather is doing. Flip flops and sandals one day and boots with tights the next. Welcome to spring in NYC! This indecision is pretty good for a shoe challenge however and it has allowed me to get a variety of shoes done so far.
Ecotrust is an organization based out of Portland, Oregon and posts jobs and internships on its website as they come in. Currently, there are no postings, but check back for other opportunities.
Canterbury was a specifically Anglican settlement. The cathedral signifies that but because of its size and prominence now also represents the city and the province. In New Zealand only the First Church of Otago has a comparable symbolism. If the Christchurch cathedral is lost we’ll be down to only one in a nation unusually lacking in enduring, built, symbols. What would we do if the Treaty House burnt down?
As the organizer of the Airleaf Victims, a group of over 600 authors who have joined together over the fraudulent activities of the now defunct company of Airleaf Publishing in Martinsville, Indiana, I was extremely disheartened and shocked when the FBI informed me on April 3, 2009, that the United States Attorney of Indiana, Timothy Morrison, had decided that our case was not going to be prosecuted by his office. According to Mr. Morrison, our case does not meet the "criminal codes" of Indiana.
without the bringing forward
I’d worked with the casting director before, and she pitched me to the Vicious Brothers for the role. They liked my demo reel, and I was offered the part. I jumped at the opportunity of working on it, as I’d never worked in the “found footage” format and wanted to experience that. It was one of those rare and wonderful instances where I didn’t have to audition.
Aside from an old-school-evening filled with memories, we also ate splendid food and drank good wine. My grandmother still cooks wonderfully well, even at a high age of 77. Her green bean salad is one of my favorites. Her cake is also indescribable. I told her that she could open up a cake shop in New York and make a lot of money off of her cheese cake and Black Forest Tart. She just laughed and probably thought I was joking. Maybe one day I will do it for her!
Between us we didn’t know
In Genesis 1-2 we find two poetic creation accounts, which differ in many ways but find common ground in asserting that humanity was formed in the image of God and was given dominion over creation. In these chapters, God and humanity enjoy unhindered fellowship. There is no jealousy or conflict between humans because everyone seeks the life and well being of everyone else. Humanity also lives in harmony with the rest of creation by caring for and cultivating the land and eating the fruits the land produced. This reveals the divine ecology in all its perfection—mutuality, compassion, fellowship, cooperation, harmony, and love.
“Health experts have named Mississippi the fattest state in the Union. The state bird of Mississippi?
At what point should I let stuff go? I've left some boxes untouched for the better part of a year because I just knew that all of my fill in the blank were packed away inside. I can't justify getting rid of all these usable materials, and on top of all that, I have mountains of schoolwork. Andrew says "It's art, keep it!" but for how long? Have any of you gone to art school? How long did you hold on to your projects? I made a 60-page pop up book my last semester, I can't just throw that out! I feel like a hoarder, but somehow this is different? In my head it is... For some perspective, these are all our newly emptied boxes:
I cannot wait to go shopping. I'll be updating periodically to let you know what I get.
##78 Siv-Anja
we have spent A LOT of time outside lately (when we haven't been sick!)
múm of the past, was now just an echo on stage, but the make-over was necessary and more than OK.
I'm excited to share an AWESOME giveaway with you all today!! A pair of earrings from Stella & Dot :)
Voting is taking place throughout Europe today and part of last week. In the United Kingdom, it was local council elections, where the ruling Conservative Party lost seats and Labour started to claw its way back from its general election losses by gaining strength locally. The major bone of contention is the austerity regime on the economy, which has lead to flatter growth and to Britain sliding into a 'double-dip' recession.
Happy Tuesday everyone.
Beer Log, October 25, 2008
They say write about what you know. I know about school, church (not going to be my setting), home life in a few different regions of the US, working in schools, doing plays in the theater... I'm just not sure. I don't want a traditional office space, though an nontraditional space could work. Thoughts? Anyone? Really, I could use a lot of help in this aspect so I can really get started in making this idea come to life... I'm rather excited about it!
2007: American Pastoral, by Philip Roth
We get a little lost on the way to the labor and delivery entrance. My husband is the best husband ever but he never did a practice drive... We laughed our way to the door, timing contractions at 5 minutes apart. Perfect.
VPVKJ Blog (vpvkjblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
I would like to know more.
So, Banned Books Week is a week dedicated specifically to books that have been banned. It's a week set aside each year by the ALA. Banned books are books that have actually been removed from libraries and school curriculums; they aren't books that have simply been challenged. Banned books won't be found in the particular library that you are in, if they have, in fact, been banned. Books are challenged and/or banned for three main reasons: containing sexually explicit material, containing offensive language or being unsuited for any age group.
Well, you’d be wrong! Because there is no scientific evidence. In fact, this campaign was invented in California in 1991 by the American National Cancer Institute and the Produce for Better Health Foundation who’s members comprise vegetable growers, packers and the logistics world of …..that’s right, fruit and veg growing and fruit and veg packing. Yes the very organisations that have the most to gain (financially) by convincing the world to eat more fruit and veg.
This is Steve’s $5 backpack from the progressive garage sale. We have been filling it with water and allowing it to soak to ensure that we won’t be killing off any of our precious babies with any prior contents. We will be using this backpack sprayer to apply seasol, powerfeed and worm tea along with compost tea…weed tea…liquid manure…anything natural that we can manufacture on site to give our garden an edge
I honestly did not know what to expect. What I got was an amazing orgasm and nothing else. That’s right– nothing came out. Now I knew this was supposed to happen but really did not know how it would happen. But it did.
It is--I am finding--a very rich document.
Ewan McCabe is the oldest brother of his family. He is the laird of a poor clan. He is a great warrior and will find himself in trouble as his son disappears but comes back with a young woman. A woman he can’t stop thinking about. But who is she as her identity is being kept secret. All he knows for now is his son swore to protect her and his enemy wants her.
After rescuing Cora from a French dungeon, Guy discovers it was one of his deciphered messages that led to her captivity. Guy strives to earn her forgiveness while outwitting their enemy. But will he find the scars on her wounded soul run too deep?
One commenter will win an ebook copy of When Shadows Fall.
On Wednesday Sen. Marco Rubio experienced what some of us have had nightmares about. Nearing the end of his foreign policy speech at the Brookings Institution, Rubio discovered that the final page of his notes was missing. Watch his unflustered reaction:
When interviewed about the promotion, the VP of Marketing at Gap, Felicity McGahan said “the ‘creative teaser’ is about mixing scale, art and optimism.”
Brazil
canyon without a care in the world. He inadvertently farts.
It seems I've gone from one extreme to another .
Add the oil to the pancake mix and stir thoroughly. Gradually add the nondairy milk, stirring, until the mixture is fully moistened but not liquid. You should be able to form the mixture into balls that just barely hold their shape, and are somewhat sticky.
Mom Guilt International
If his programme is successful, tens of millions of children who would otherwise have died in infancy will survive to adulthood, he boasts.
On animal farm"
